
lithicacity.com	
HomeLand of BethlehemThe Other WorldOf LightKingdoms of SunlightA Garden and River - Land of LightMore
Land of Bethlehem
	 	

	 	

Land of Bethlehem




by Lucifer







Now if there is to be a time when the world will be at peace with each other there are the needless attacks to cease that stir up war, and therefore what is required? But if all are content to be at peace, indeed, all looking with hope towards ascension, towards achieving heavenly bodies, to dwell even more in the Heavens, to have the Lord and the Christ come down early, for a period of covenant, to dwell on Earth in his holy city of New Jerusalem, to see great things and great peace from our God, who will heal our afflictions and bring us towards greater abilities, greater ability in terms of spiritual abilities, what they call 'spiritual gifts' as we obey more and more and increase our spiritual abilities, until we have reached the same abilities as the Sarmatians, the stars in the sky placed there by man, then we will be in a state of peace, and the Lord will dwell with us, and we will ascend easily, reach new abilities and realize new wonders, and eat of the fruits of truth and knowledge, bringing about new ways of healing, new ways of communicating amongst the Heavens, relying upon the Lord, and His power in much that we do, where we will have only one enemy left, it being the devil worshippers, who are intent on sychopantry, and all the wickedness and lies and even the attempts to start wars, to begin contentions that might be violent, and hold humanity back again, keeping us from achieving the Heavens. Indeed there are greater levels of peace and harmony with the planet, with the Heavens, and greater levels of peace with God, greater holiness and abilities in spiritual combat so that arts of combat become cancelled out for bliss and joy with God, and with others, where true love is able to come to greater heights and prosperity may come to ultimate wealth for all, where every good desire is granted, everything of sorrow cast away, the sorrow of the exit from Eden. Indeed you may be able to achieve enlightened communications between all the hosts of Heaven, and I write as a human, considering you, for be going up to Mount Zion, and let the Lord be teaching you His ways, for when peace and harmony is had with God, the only enemy left will be the devil worshippers, hateful and envious of you, desiring to start wars, for war is the enemy. Indeed it is war that is the enemy and has always been the enemy, for by the learning of war even, war erradicates itself for peace, and by the learning of contentions, contentions cancel themselves out for peace, and the only enemies left are the enemies who cannot cease beginning war and beginning contentions for no reason, for no reason, I call, Erris being that erris is the devil's trigger to begin war, for it is a reason to the devil, with concerns to his war against the Lord's kingdoms, and yet it is considered no reason to humans. Now then erris triggers the desire to begin contentions and to begin war, and those who cannot cease from beginning war, from beginning contentions, these are the devil's people, and the devil worshippers, for whom there is no choice, they envy and are hateful of the Lord's kingdoms and people, and in their sycophantry they wish to destroy it, to begin war and contentions, sowing lies, doing the work of demons and the devil, and thus the Sarmatians are required in this world of peace and harmony with God, when nationalities do not matter anymore, where wealth is ultimate for all, where every good desire is granted, when everything is made by what was made by us, to take away our labour, when we are able to achieve peace on the planet, and ultimate wealth for all. Now then Erris, what is it and what does it? But it is bitterness, of the heart and soul, and it brings forth contention, for it brings a person to begin contention, for the bitterness of the heart and soul is erris and comes with the good pride of a person that the pride of the person, a good pride that is not evil, it finds the substance of a person wronged, and out of joint, not dwelling in a fair and righteous balance, and it brings forth bitterness by the good pride that is with truth, that brings fairness and right upon what is not fulfilled in fairness and right, that bitterness come forth, erris, and it acts against others, for the unfairness of the substance goes out at that time and spreads among the people, and so a wise man, of excellent understanding, he says, what is wrong that has occurred to you, for has there not been unfairness and wrong occuring to you? Now then if it is the woman, she relies upon the man to know that there has been unfairness and wrong occurring to her, or she is having witnessed unfairness and wrong, and so you are a physcic people, you who are Zion, for the women of Zion are expecting men to be psychic, some of them, for they commicate with the spirit, and the Zion people, they are a pyschic people in this way, that they comminicate much with the spirit, being people of covert action, of Danielle, and not so much Anne Frank, and the women are going in the ways of Danielle more than Anne Frank, for the Danielles too care for the people. Now then Bethlehem comes, the realm of peace, of not judgment and concern for what must be performed on land, what wickedness must be delt with on land, but Bethlehem, it is as if apathetic to these things, and yet it is the realm of peace, and it performs on land by its children, for its children are having understanding, and indeed excellent understanding, and they are psychologists of what they have believed psychology to be, of people of excellent understanding, and the men born of Bethlehem, they are of more understanding than the psychologists, for they have misunderstood what psychologists are, because of the idols and the entertainments. Now then what say you of the psychic women of Zion, who go in the way of Danielles, who are in the respect and fear of God, who keep to beauty? But because of the pride that is theirs that rules themselves, that is is fair, and it finds the substance not fair and not right, so there is erris and it is given to attack the man, for the disruption within, it is given as if evil as the complaint to the man, and him having the mind of Christ, a psychologist of compassion, as they believe psychologists to be, and hears not what is false, but knows truth, and he is the Christ in this thing if he is of excellent understanding, that he has excellent understanding and wisdom. Now he is born in Bethlehem, these men, and they are the children of Bethlehem, these men. Now this is in the realm of Jerusalem, and it is also Sion. Now Bethlehem, it is for the peace of society, and it brings forth great good by peace, for judgment it does not have, and yet it judges continously, being the judgments of the spiritual, and not the judgments of justice against wickedness. Now then the women of Sion, they are Danielles, many, and some Anne Frank, and they pass injustice as a complaint, to the man of excellent understanding. Now she who has complaints of this type, she is called faithful, for she keeps to Sion, and it is a thing of Sion, and the man of excellent understanding, he is having the Temple of the Christ. Now then the Lord comes, to dwell on Earth, and people learn combat until it cancels itself out, so that there is peace, and they learn war until it cancels itself out, and there is no more war, and combat and war goes to the Sarmatians,for David is converted to the Sarmatians, for nations cancel themselves out in terms of war, that the war and world is now between the Lord's kingdoms, the over-whelming majority, and the smallest portion that is the devil's kingdoms that stir up war and wickedness for the people, and so the Sarmatians fight it, for the lessser enlightenment is the resting place now and the Lord dwells on Earth, for we say, please, Our father, dwell on Earth with us, that we have peace and Bethlehem is fulfilled, for the time of peace is come, of peace for the whole Earth, even for the planets that are in our solar system, where people will go to, and the city of Earth is lifted high, indeed it rises up many layers, and it is a city among the clouds, for the clouds are among it, and the Mountains of Zion, they are at the places of the Earth, and New Jerusalem comes, and there is peace, and the buildings are gold and there is ultimate wealth for all, and only down in the deep valleys, in the ugly places, there is swarming the devil's people, grotesque and liking to stir up war, and these are for the Sarmatians, for David partners with the Sarmatians, and David and the Sarmatians, they fight the devil's people, and the atheist too fights the devil's people, though he does not believe, for to the atheist they are religious, the devil's people, and wicked people who abuse and do evil. Now then you will be closer to the Sarmatians, and yet the Sarmatians are higher than the mountains, and you dwell, Sion and Zion, at the height of the mountains, among the clouds, and the base of Mount Zion, the Mountains of Zion, it is raised up to the height of the other Mountains, for all the land of Zion is raised up, is lifting many levels, and the places of the devil, they are remaining low, and they are deeper valleys than ever, for they were valleys prior, indeed they were below the valleys. Now then it is a land of high cliffs in many places, where Zion and Sion are going to the edge of high cliffs, so that there are many of these ledges of high cliffs and the whole of the land is lifted up many levels. Now then, take a lesson from Migdal Eder, and view his land, his realm, for has it not already been known about? Now in this higher level, that I call Bethlehem, the children of men are not able to dwell upon this Zion and Sion, and the atheist is able to, not being one of the children of men, who are atheists, but being an atheist, not child-like. Now Damascus is going up with it, and David, and the Sarmatians are much higher, indeed, they are in the Heavens, and the children of men, they are cast out and over the cliff edge, to dwell in the deep valleys that are over the deeper chasms of hell, for they still dwell upon land, and yet in the land that is become valleys, for Sion and Zion is lifted up to the height of the mountains, to the clouds, and those who are going down from there, they are receiving harassment in Mala, for it is a thing of humans, that it happens to them, for the rest is too low for them, and so they dwell on their plain and look upwards, that they not hear an evil servant curse them, for they insult themselves on another spiritual plain that they do not know about, and the soul is able to know of it. Now then David, who has Damascus, who dwells on the higher plain of Sion and Zion, for they do as well in Bethlehem, and the forest of Eton, and the lower plains, that are lifted up, of Solomon, for Bethlehem is only a little too high for him, yet he ascends at times, let then David be partnered with the Sarmatians, and he being of a blessing, says, yet if there is anything better, we will be it, for they embarrass Joshua, and even put him to shame a little, then these of David who are able, the angel will say to them, be reading all the books the angel gives, and be becoming an angel, for a lower angel you will be, and be gathered with me, and not unto me, to have me as your king, and certainly not to worship me, but gathered with me, to be among me, for then lay down your weapons for a moment, and a moment more, and only a little, and be becoming a lower angel, to be gathered with me, and be studying the scripture, and you know the spirits that are evil, and your former self will be your foundation, and then be considering much Elijah, for in the ways of Elijah I send you, to be Elijah and a lower angel. For he relied upon God, and said, if I have fullfilled, and obeyed, if I am in the right, so then if I have performed, then let the Lord perform, and so then you will perform to the Lord, and say, if I have performed, let the Lord perform, for the Lord is God, He is faithful, and He is not wicked, so that are you thinking you will perform, and He will leave you stranded, as a wicked man who leaves a person stranded who had fulfilled to him good? Now be deaf to the lower levels, for they are like animals to you, not worthy anything, and their foolish lack of obedience, for if animals are foolish does that change the standard for you, who are people? But do not even compare yourselves to them, for they are not worth considering, and their existence does not change the eternal standard that is for people, and that is for you. Now then be dwelling heavily in wisdom, always relying upon the Lord to perform when you have performed, keeping to obedience, obeying as it right and not like the fickle-girl, and so the elite soldiers are as worthless things to you then, and not worth considering, and the people of Sion and Zion, your citizens, those you are concerned for, whose well-being and safety, only them, and Solomon, a little lower, you are concerned for, and kings of nations, they are foot-stools, not worth naming, for who names a foot-stool? Now Nephtali, it dwells on the plains of Solomon, also, only a little lower than Bethlehem, and it ascends to the clouds, also and then returns. Now then where are you Sarmatians, but you are in the Heavens that are high above the clouds, and you are able to see Sion and Zion and the deep valleys, what are they, but places of darkness?







Now in this world the devil worshippers are the enemy and they are even among us, and the Sarmatians are able to find them, for they do not gather always, and they do not all confess to what they are, for communication is now beyond ignorance, for the hope and desire in the Lord, even for the atheist, is for peace and not for war, is for harmony with the planet, and harmony with our neighbours, and where has the evil come from that we fought? But it has come from the devil worshippers and they claimed religion often, more often than anything else, and they claimed many things, and yet with communication without ignorance, they confess they are devil worshippers, for their desires and their hate and envy of the Lord's kingdoms communicates even with will and then actions, that they are for desecration, torture, abuse, and sycophantry, for with the daughter, has it not begun with the father of her, that she should have rebelled against him, and been loyal to God? Now then, be loyal to God before the parent. Now then, hate the evil and love the good. Now then, do not let the jelousy of the younger cause you to sin. Now then, remove yourself from the rebellion of the rebellious, for they are ill and contagious. Now then, go not near the doors of the wicked, where they dwell. Now then, do not allow the parent to continue to make the child sin because of the parent's wickedness, for if the child is good, the parent should be pleased. In summary, honour your father and your mother. Now then be loyal to God, always, and believing in Him and His good and promise for you, no matter the family you are in. Now if the parents should believe and the children, will they not believe also? But what occurs? Now unto some families a devil's servant is in the family, from good parents, and hindered they are until they have departed from their parent's home, for the ways of the devil are found in them, indeed they hate God and are envious of the kingdoms of the Lord. Now they are not atheists, but they say they are for God. Now lies and deception are found heavily with them already. Now this is not honouring the parents if the parents are good, but the child is the child of other parents, who are the devil's people. Now then it is good I have thought, that the Lord is coming down to dwell on Earth in New Jerusalem, and so it will be known, outside New Jerusalem, who is rebellious to Him, the Lord, and who is not. Now what portion of the fathers are rebellious to Him, the Lord? Now there are those not rebellious because they are men much like God, and they are good men, indeed. Now the portion of men was very small, as far as I could tell, who were rebellious against God, for they were liking God, that He should dwell on Earth with them. Now are the parents honest, being truthful people? Now for what reason is any child so deceptive, so much an old man, so much with lies of conformity? Now is one of the parents such? Is one of the parents such a liar and so deceptive? Now they feign belief, and are deceptive, and the father is this, and one of the children this, and the rebellious child is not so towards God. Now these are priests, of the house of purity and false-goodness in Babylon, and the father is one and one of the children? But for what reason are the parents both honest and in the truth and one of the children so deceptive, for he hates his parents and is insatiably envious. Now this is not honouring parents. Now then peace then, and rest, for what can be done? But the child is not really the problem, but the parent, the father, if he is also a priest of deception and lies, and if not, there is a child who is already an old man, for he is no doubt slandering already, insatiably envious, and concealing hatred. Now what then can be done? But nothing can be done, and should he be encouraged in this more than the good children? But this old man, who is a child, is dishonest, and so it is, and though he may not hate his mother, is not already great misogyny found with him? Now then the father is righteous and loving, and the child of this deceptive type, he seems as if he is an old man, and not even his son, and how can this be? Now such has only happened, and it is so, and the parents have other children, and the child who is insatiably envious and deceptive is not encouraged in this. Now then only go to the enlightenment, you who are father's and seek God, for fathers are dwelling at home too much, and there is a mother, and withdraw your governance from your family, for there is a short limit, and no more you can do, and the wife wants her husband around? But withdraw your hand, leave your children in peace, you fathers, and your wife is with you, for neither of you need to parent too much, for the parents who give too much attention to their children are only adding to the folly of the children, that you withdraw your parenting and allow God to parent, for be you seeking the enlightenment and the women seeking them in the morning, for be dwelling with God, and Bethlehem, can the law go forth from it? But I offer Bethlehem, and so I have performed, and thus may be the daughter Bethlehem to you, and these matters concerned with, and the daughter of Jerusalem, concerned with the people and what wickedness is occurring, and the Danielle, concerned with the prophecies and the Bible, and more focused upon religion. Now these three girls, young women, they are the second names of the throne of the hill of Jerusalem and every nation is choosing its moon if they are chosen at that time, and one of them is sitting on the throne of the hill of Jerusalem, for Migdal Eder desires for them to sit there. Now there is one daughter on this throne at any given time. Now then the cloud plains of Sion and Zion and Jerusalem are having the cliff walls going up to them, and there are the great stone bridges that go to the plains that are only a little lower and there are large eagles that float above Sion and Zion, and all the cloud plains, and the Priest-King gives truth to all the Earth, without any shadow of a lie in it, and the angel, to rebuke the devil has said, and if he will walk in my ways, he will judge the people, for in his giving of truth, yet he may judge what is truth, and by sound understanding it comes, and if he gives truth with shadow of a lie in it, yet the Lord is able to give pure truth with no lie in it, for the Priest-King is the sun, and he gives pure truth, the light of day, to all the Earth, and he has the white robes and if any other colour, it is gold, and his old sin has been removed from him, and he is given worthy robes and he is worthy, and I call him minus and Joshua Heyudu, and he rises over Sion and Zion, and yet not over Jerusalem, and he gives truth to all the Earth, except for the polytheists, and by the light of him do all the kings of the Earth see, and all its princes, and all its rulers, and all its citizens, and councillours of citizens and councillors of kings and councillors of rulers and councillors of princes, and the light shines upon the she-goats and Elsnon-pretty and to the exposed rocks of Esua, it shines upon them, and it shines upon the forests of Tel Eton and the forests of Solomon and upon the forests of Nephtali and the forests of Sion and Zion that are at the cloud plain, and the large Eagles float above Sion and Zion, and all the high places, and they bring truth to the sun, for they go to the sun, and they deliver the truth to him, for the small birds go between the trees of the forest, and the large birds, the large eagles, they go between stars and continents and nations. So then the large Eagles are to cleanse themselves in the purifying fire of Zion, to purify lies and temptation of lies from them, and they go to the baths of fire that are in the high places, and purify themselves in these baths of fire, that they cleanse out all temptation to lie, to commit wickedness in their role, and they purify all lies from their beaks, and then take the truth unto the sun, going with light speed to the sun with their messages. Now will it not come to be, when much is established, when the nations no longer are ready to cast off the meyhem and evil of the lesser enlightenments, that they will give unto the sun, the giant lady, and all her people at his disposal, that he be able to give the truth to all of Zion? Now I looked and the sorrow of the secular Eagles who bathed themselves in fire, they dimmed the light of the sun, and it was as if always evening in that land, with sunlight and yet evening, and so I considered, should then the Eagles that bath themselves in fire not be? For they have dimmed the sun and it is always evening in that land. Now then there were smaller birds, not eagles, and flocks of them going throughout the high places, and the sun was not dimmed, and it was the bright of day, with purity of light and Bethlehem, and I considered, wisdom has considered this thing. Now then Jerusalem does not have the sun, for the sun is Sion and Zion, the High-Priest of the Zion Temple. Now yet still, do they not have their birds that go to and fro, and give them light? Now there are bon-fires around the Temple of the angel, and there may not be a small fire, that is too small, for only fires sufficiently large may burn there. Now then to the catholics the angel gives, faithful you are and your followers, and yet they are given small candles to hold, the followers, and so they are in a valley considering the land of the angel, Bethlehem, and they walk through the valley, faithful, and with reverence to the Lord, holding each a small candle, and the streams and small lakes are at their feet when they pass by them, and they are streams and lakes in the moon-light, in the light of the moon, and each of the followers holding a candle, and their Shepherd, blessing and being blessed, and does the Priest-King or the angel accuse him? But the angel, can be said for certainty, does not accuse him. Now then what shall their moon be, and what spirit? But though the angel does not accuse them, yet she may not sit in the throne of the hill of Jerusalem, though she is their moon that they chose, and their moon will be for them, for their nation if it pleases them, and will they not then be considering, yet the moon will remain a spirit, and we choose no host because of our ways of religion, that it would be blasphemy to us? Now the angel considers that it is good, for will your moon not remain a spirit and you not choose a host for your people, who is a host you have found on Earth? For so you will not chose a host, because of your ways. Now then to the Pope, who is called that, be not tempted to consider apology to me, for why should you consider it? But you are seen at a higher place than your people, and it is so with your people and your ways, and your people are walking through the valleys of your ways in the reverence of God, for they are valleys of reverence to the Lord that they choose to walk through.




Now there are the mega-catapults that take a whole nation, that destroy the image of them and do wickedness, and it is part of the war between women and women, and the angel has said, yet you have the right to fight and to do war, but you may not use the mega-catapults that land upon nations of women, for the women belong to the men, and it is not your right at such a degree of war, for there is a layer above the land, an atmosphere in the spiritual, a blanket laid across the land, and it is not clean, and in this low cloud that comes from industry, yet women have committed mass weapons against nations of women, and they have not the right to use this low cloud in this way, for the low cloud is for Ariel, the mist of it, and with Ariel and the things of Ariel, the cloud is being pure, and it brings snow upon a hot day and cold water droplets, the offspring of water drops, upon a hot day, and yet there is the infection of the cloud and it comes from industry of foolishness and sin, and it infects the land, and is a haze of sickly vapour and cloud, and it is ugly, and by it there is brought weapons of acidic rain that rain down upon nations of people, and they target nations of people, and yet they are not truth that falls upon them, but false-hood that is rained down upon them, the acidic rain that is ugly and comes from the sickly and ugly clouds of poisonous clouds that attach themselves to the pure clouds of Ariel. Now then the angel says, swoop away the ugly clouds with your power people of Zion, wave your right hand and banish them, swoop them far away and let them sail off and die, for they will die if you are swooping them, for in your right hand is the power, for deny them your ears and eyes with your right hand. Now then the pure clouds of Ariel, they are for you, Sion and Zion. Now what are the holy clouds of learning, the clouds of religious learning? But I will not write of it. Now it is Mars who may purchase the clouds of Jupiter, to give unto the Earth. Now then who is knowing what clouds are good and what are bad? But such is not an interpreter of clouds, but it is those able to know what clouds are to be waved away, and who is having the power in their right hand, the purity in it, and the grains of star dust that glow bright as stars, dust of the rings of Saturn, and the light of pure light, to banish the clouds with agility, with nuance? Now in the right hand of her, there is the light and star-dust of the rings of Saturn, in the other hand, the light of truth, and they cast off the poisonous clouds, and how will they be separated to a completion? But there are the holy things of children of angels, and the spirituality of them, and their clouds are good, and there are the holy clouds in places and next to them, poisonous clouds, and the people pass through clouds and take of one cloud and see the poisonous cloud and do not consider it. Now so they travel through the mist-lands, the places of clouds, and who can keep track of all of the different clouds? Now then, Zion's clouds are come down, and sheltered is the Mountain Zion, for the people dwell amongst the Heavens, and recline amongst the Heavens, and the stars of lower angels travel quickly across the night sky, and the moon of a people is the moon not offensive to the person, for they will know their moon, and by it, possibly their people, for the spirit dwells in the moon, the sign of her in the Temple of the hill of Jerusalem, and those who do not have her sit there, on the moon, they are one type, and it is so, and those who have her occupy the moon, the host, they are a type of people and it is so. Now for whom is she occupying the moon, the host, for almost all of the people are the type that the host does not occupy the moon, and yet for the infant she occupies the moon, the host. Now what is her opinion of the infant to you? Now which infant is her child? But for the infant who has no parents, she is the mother of the infants that have no parent. Now as she grows older, yet the orphans who were infants at the time of her, they have her as their mother. Now so the orphans are called children of the moon, and it is a spiritual matter, for those who will abuse the orphan will abuse the child of the moon. Now the orphan has no siblings by this thing, except for those siblings they have by the parents they no longer have. Now then, for those who have parents, be then in an orphan in Mala, for threshing yourself, and consider who is your mother, which moon, whether it is Danielle, Anne Frank, or Bethlehem, or some other. Now what is the mother of Daniel? Indeed he had the prince of him, and it was Michael. Now if you are having not a moon of you, who are a man, but a prince of you who is an angel, then did even Daniel know the name of the angel who was his prince? But Gabriel told him. Now the Japanese men, they will have the prince of them an angel, and not a moon, if they are an orphan. Now a mother of them a winged woman of Heaven, if they are an orphan? Now every orphan, what say you of Lucifer? Is he not a smaller moon, not a primary, but a third moon? Now should you bow to him, or are you forbidden? But indeed you are forbidden if it is wrong, for you mother is in Heaven, a Kami, and your prince is in Heaven, a kami lord, and a lord of angels, who is an angel. Now then will you not know the Heavens by this way? But those of you who may bow to Lucifer, come and let us do our work, for we have much to do, and good tiding to bring, and we are able now, and possibly receiving help, for they are good to us, are they not, them who are great, and who go forth to protect us, and who accomplish all great things, and we are ready, able, to do good on Earth, to light the fires, to bring the rivers of good to them, to make the land peaceful, to hang jewels in the sky for them, and all the things of their delight are we ready to do, and possibly we will have their help and not go poor, without aid, not be ignored by them, for they are busy and many of them, most of them, are great, and they have swords, and armour, and all the things of war, and we are a river to them, sparkling waters, and give good to them. Now our rediculous house, not rediculous, but good, for in English it is understood, the thing of it, that it is a river, the house, not divided by a river, for it is a sparkling river that smites the land, and it goes through the land and it is winding, narrow by comparison to the Nile, and yet it is good, and silver we throw to them, indeed we throw silver at all who pass, handfuls of silver and diamonds we throw to them, and it showers them, the silver and diamonds. For the mist of us, that goes out around us, it is silver and diamonds. Now we are a river kami and what our name is, you will know, if you are able, and we wind through the land before there were buildings around us and bring good to the great, indeed the great are given good by us, and they are valiant men, indeed lords of men have taken a knee and taken good from us, and we offered it to them, indeed showered them with diamonds and silver, and they go to do brave deeds that are valiant and yet they may not go, and they may not depart, for it is sin, indeed they shall remain at the river to take good from it, for valient they are, indeed great warriors, and those who take good from us, they must not depart from what good they take from us, for it is sin to depart, indeed, by wisdom, it is sin! Now then there is a branch that grows along the river, a tree, and take shelter from it, indeed recline under the branches of it, the shade. Now there is a rock nearby, and indeed you can sit upon it, for it is there for you, and there is a slope to the river, and it is for you, and what is there not here, at the river, that you need, for all is provided for you here at the river. So is the river, and we are the river, the river kami and has our house not been heard among the people, from older times and even today? Now good we give to the them, to the great. Now some have drawn up water, and it goes with them, and they may not depart from it, for it is sin to depart for it. Now others must stay, for they have received good, and they must stay.




Now if a someone is coming into your home do you not drive them out of theirs? Now it is for the forest of Tel Eton. But for the man driving himself out of his home to come into yours, it is a man who desires men, and he is angry, in rage, a servant of the devil, for your greatness he hates and the Lord's kingdoms he hates, for he is against the Lord and all his people, for he attacks the land. Now every man should say, I do not know of him, for it is truth, and no man should know of another man, and in truth he does not, for he knows of himself, and he has the Lord and his own house, and those who are like nagging and pulling fools, who grab a hold of the garment that is being worn, that cling to the garment, men and women do it, roaming about from place to place, social people, mingling much among each other, children with many siblings, talking all the time to each other, these are them grabbing hold of the garment, the women of them, and they beckon to go to those who do not mind their own business, who do not have their own house, who cling to the garment more, who steal the clothing of him, that is in his carrying device, who steal the gold from out of his horse's satchel, who steal the reigns, even, for the leather he steals, for it is so by Mala, and she leads to the thief, the social woman of this type, and the thief steals out of the horse and the carrying device. Now then, give her no words, for she clings to your shirt, and she knows not what she is, and what she does, and the thief knows not what he is and what he does, for blindness the Earth has suffered, and who is wise among you? Now it is so by Mala, and the wife says, be not going with them, and she does not know, but her spirit knows, and the wife covets him, and he is not robbed.




Now if obesity causes you to sin, that you are bitter to commit wickedness, to spread evil, than better to be abstaining from food, for the body has caused you to sin. Now those not brought to sin by it, do you not say, eat and have good?




Now I looked, and almost all was parellel in Mala, for there was signs by men, for all things that were done by people in Mala.




Now there was the man who approached friendly, and soon began to bully that he might murder, for it was too wicked without it, and it was not much wisdom to understand his heart in it, for himself. Now as it was in Ria, so it could be in Mala.




Now there was the man who pushed with both hands when he walked by, by mala, and he goeth on, confused and a fickle-girl, for he was harassed by confusion in the affliction of his mind and heart.




Now there was the man whose horse met the near push of a man, when he walked by, that the dark horse of war he rode upon, it glanced and the head of it pushed away the matter before it might occur. Now better this man, than the man who was confused, for this man is not an evil thing, in the angel's opinion.




Now if a man has anything, an elephant, a horse, a lamb, a mountian lion, a young lion, a king, a prince, a peaceful woman, a clever woman, yet he is supposed to have these things and not be these things, for a man is over them, the man who has them, and so it is a thing of Christianity and Judaism, both. Now what is had in Mala, it is to be placed upon land, for as it is in Heaven, so it should be on Earth.




Now then if a man is a horse, he will be too tall, and too much rock and bone, and insolent will he be, for a man will have a horse and not be a horse, for good is given for good. Now submit, each one, unto another, where good is given that good is given in return.




Now there are many types of horses and there is even the unicorn horse, that the Lord has told about by a prophet. Now there are fair horses, dark horses, speckled horses, brown horses, and the angel loves the dark horses of war. Now these are not the horses that are spirits of God, that go out from his throne, for these horses are holy spirits of Heaven.




Now the plain of Bethlehem, higher than Israel, is not as the learning of the arts of spiritual combat so that there combat cancelled and peace, and the learning of excellent understanding, to be like the Christ, and up among those realms is the councillor of the Earth, and it is a holy plain, of light and goodness and ultimate wealth, and every good desire granted, for they will have no evil desires any longer, for they will have the understanding to hate the bad and desire the good. And is it a land of butter and honey, and of pure light and flocks of clouds that are pure, and there is the time of meditation for them, and the holy learning, and there is love, all types of love, and true love, and how can any perish anymore, and how can there be the sorrow of the land after Eden, of dust and the heat of day? But that place is far removed, and upon the plain of light, the plain of Bethlehem, there is peace and harmony, and they will become of great ability, for they will be self-actualized, finally, having achieved the plain of Bethlehem, and the Sarmatians, far above them, they will have attained the mighty, the greater ability.




Now then what is Eretz Chadrack at this time? But there is an Assyrian torture device, a stone of it upon an alter of stone, and it is in the wilderness amongst grass, for it is surrounded by grass and is in a plain, and the forest and high trees are around it, and not all know of it, for it is in the deep forest, and the Assyrian device, it may be used by any who have enough numbers, for there is a house of stone, for learning, and the learning of strategy, and they are able to learn it by the presense of the device, and the device was placed there after the great war and they lied and called it capacity and such things, for with it they placed Babylon and Assyria in the fortresses of Eretz Chadrack, and it is there to be used by any who know of it, for they need not have anything, any special ability, to use it, and so one group may take it and use it, and another group may take it and use it, and it is with partnership of the priests of Babylon, who are in the fortresses, and it is placed there by the meeting place at an earlier time. Now all who deny what is called the second holocaust, for it came after the great war, these will be thrown in prison, if Zion is coming even more, for there is no possibility of debate in this thing, and the second holocaust is still ongoing, for it has spread over the planet. Now the priests of Babylon, they will be tortured because they tortured, and they will be killed, and you will not spare any of them, not one, but every one of them you will not cease to hunt if they are fleeing at that time. Now if Zion is then coming and truth is casting off every lie, than those who deny the second holocaust will be placed in prison for it, for it will not happen again. Now with the same spirit that was attacking and beginning the great war and slaughtering the Hebrew Jews, it is the same spirit with which a wrong spirit lead, to begin the second holocaust, and so this spirit is indeed not my friend, but is my enemy, indeed enemy to God, for this spirit is having the devil as his Lord. Now then how can the device and the fortress for terrorists of any type be destroyed? But it can only be destroyed by travelling to the meeting place, and there the power of it may be destroyed, for the device will decay immediately and the Earth will open under it, and it will perish, and the woman of Babylon, who appears at the places of the fortresses, her spirit will perish on that day.




Now none has any right to an opinion on this thing, of destroying the stone that is upon the alter, until that day that Zion is ready to perform it, for I write of opposition, for it is not for any to oppose until Zion is ready to perform it. Now what must some be, according to standard understanding? But must they not be devil-worshippers, and sycophants, and they have been so for a long time, for though they are the smaller portion, yet they have gone out again and again to kill the good and to torture and desecrate what they could, and to find other ways to be violent for which they would not be placed in prison. Now let their breath be silent, for what does their opinion matter anymore, for the truth has driven out darkness, and more of it, for the fire has grown larger and sent light into the darker places, and indeed the Earth was torturing, and a small portion torturing many, and it was for any group of terrorists to take hold of the ability and do this thing, for the meeting place permitted for the fortress in the forest to be built that any could use it, and who it was originally intended for, I do not know. Now then destroy the device and do not permit any such device to ever be built, for it is already forbidden, and yet they have taken long efforts and much perseverance to bypass such that is against these devices and things.




Now then make no threats against the priests, less they say, do as you please, for you have not said something, and you did not write it, for speak not of Sion and Zion in Babylon, for they slash with swords, if they like. Now the fortresses are small, indeed nothing, and yet they are given power by the meeting place, and with a little they send out wide nets over the land, and the place of the Assyrian stone, it is hidden deep in the forests, and the trees that are around it, they give no truth to the trees in the forest that are not close to the Assyrian stone. Now the stone gives sight of it, the whole of it, and the terrorists dwell, a small band of them, among the stone house where they are able to learn. Now there are these stones placed in almost every nation of the Earth, for they moved about planting them by the power of the meeting places, for some foolish generation has done it, or a group foolish within them, or a group not with any nation, for I have wondered, are they not devil-worshippers who have done this thing?




Now then the flock of slaughter, is it not ugly? But the Lord has said he has broken the staff beauty. Now the flock of slaughter, is it having any boundaries of the hindrances, the fear of God? But the Lord has broken his staff bounds. Now he has broken these staff concerning the slaves, the gods, those who are slaves and dwelling among the people, and the slaves attempt to do that all God has done to them, and those who descend from their plain of enlightenment, do they not receive a rebuke from their soul, if it is so for them? Now then the slaves, they are the flock of slaughter, and they are in every place on Earth, among the people, and so then give a large group of the flock to the angel, when it is time, for if the right things are done, will there not be more peace on the Earth? Now flock of slaughter, you will sell it and buy it among the people, and owners will kill them and be blameless, and the Lord has fed the flock, and yet the angel does not fed them, and as for the Egyptians, the angel does not consider them unless it is the Nile realm. Now then depart from the Nile realm, will you not, and be entering into Israel, and turn then, will you not, and turn in all directions, gathering up the flock of slaughter, the ugly and brutal and cruel things that they are, and those who gather what is not a thing for slaughter, they will be killed and not quickly, and what they would do, will be done to them, for all their wealth will go to the one they would have gathered who was not for slaughter. Now then are you not to then be taking yet again, as you did hundreds of years before this time, what is considered, a long time ago, the devices of a foolish Shepherd? Now then they are not evil if they only gather up the flock that is meant for slaughter, and prior they gathered up those meant for slaughter with those not meant for slaughter, for they took up the devices of a foolish Shepherd, and in this they were evil that they gathered the people with the slaves. Now then not all who wield devices of a foolish Shepherd are indeed a foolish Shepherd, only the devices are for brutal and cruel beasts, who are insolent and having no bounds. Now though the devices of the foolish Shepherd may seem mean and harsh, for the tongue of them is becoming as if another man, yet they are only devices and they are not the person. Now the Harrod has said of the precious and beautiful, they are a slave, and it is already written by me that Harrod is a slave, for projection comes from his mouth, and he is constipated, filled up with tape worms, and there is the Harrod for whom the eyes are blind with iron for pupils. Now then if the Harrods of iron eyes are metallic spheres, blind to all, if they are are so opposite that they are pulling in with magnetic force, being so opposite to truth and reality that they lower the head, with blind eyes, and they pull down all truth around them, for it is so by Mala, for if they so pull towards them, and they are indeed in the depths of Earth, slaves under rock, and much rock, buried by rock, that they pull down towards them where they are, under the Earth, so then speak not to the Harrod of this type, who rests and pulls down, for they are the devil's magnets, Harrods of metal that is opposite to truth and opposite to reality, and they pull with nothing, with their existence, and they are of the most ignorant mind, the most blindness and deafness, for they are opposites of truth. Now metal is their mind, solid with iniquity and ignorance, and given truth, they devour it and bring it to them, and so then give them the opposite of truth, about themselves, for they are small, in truth, and insignificant, and they are as if nothing. Now more may be given to you holy people about arts of self-defence and holy combat. Now if devices of the devil are found in any, they are the devil's people, for a person of the Lord's cannot be this Harrod or have this Harrod.




Now what is she, this thing, for whom her husband is only a man to sleep with, who perceives not wisdom, being void of wisdom, and understands not love, or true love, and she goes out without knowledge of herself or others, for she goes out with boldness and kindness, and she is bold and kind, and a marvel to the people she is and does not know. Now then God she has not perceived, and there is as if nothing for her, for the Heavens are not there, and yet an animal is with its mate, and she is not even so, for an animal is better than her, and she is better than most, one of the better people?




Now the valley of Migdal Eder, it belongs to the Jews who are the people, and not to David, for either Zion Jews or Hebrew Jews.




Now I wrote, God will be dwelling on Earth with you in the New Jerusalem, if you are attaining what I call Bethlehem, and yet it is for you to consider, with concerns to religion, for I am saying, ask Him to do so, or will you not? Now what is missing? But is it not New Jerusalem that will be missing and God dwelling in His Temple? But if the people fullfill, will not the Lord, most High, fullfill, and come and complete? But then I considered, would we have completed enough that the Lord would dwell with us, for He knows the right time and place when it will be so, and yet selfishly I wish for it, for I wish to be on Earth when it is so, for this thing I call Bethlehem, where the land is lifted up, is it not missing the Lord? Now Muslims cannot allow the Hebrew Jews, Jerusalem, to build the Temple until a thing is fulfilled, for others have not fulfilled a thing. Now the Hebrew Jews, Jerusalem, it must fulfill what is right to angels, or else the Muslims are not able to let you build the Temple. Now Muslims are because of the obedience of angels. Now if you are fulfilling to angels, all you must fulfill by righteousness, then they may allow you to build the Temple. Now who then is greater on Earth, any nation, but are not the Muslims greater than all nations? Now when there is an angel upon Earth, indeed there is the Lord, and there are the angels, and there are two kingdoms, as if the Earth is in two, and yet the Lord is not divided from the angel, for the angel is the Lord's servant. Now so then what is humble, it is greater than all, for it becomes the greatest, and the Sarmatians must lay down their weapons for it, if you will boast of them, the Sarmatians, against the angel in this thing. Now it is a gesture by them. Now the shepherds of them are their leaders, who is speaking as if he too was an angel, and the angels do not give each other advice, for it risks blasphemy, and so it is when a leader of Muslims is meeting with an angel, and he is as a companion to an angel and he may not go under the roof of a thing that is dedicated, of the angel, for he is speaking as if he too is an angel. Now an angel, will go into his dwelling? But let them meet under the sky, or at a place not of either, and it is acceptable. Now both are enemies of them who is the owner of the place they meet, for it is with understanding. Now to Jerusalem, rebel not in anything concerning the angel, for Mount Zion, all of them, are upon Earth, and so I write, what is in Mala, in Heaven, that must be built upon land? Now a tithe you owe me and the building of what is already, what things you are to build, for you build, they will say, the Temple with the angel's permission, for you must fulfill to Zion first, and if you are then fulfilling, then what has not fulfilled, it will be having a guilt of wickedness, not fulfilling when it is able. Now it will then be said, two people of obedience and the Earth is ours, all the kingdom is ours, if other nations are not fulfilling. But then why will it be thought that other nations will not fulfill, for the angel is demanding that you do what you so much desire to do, that no doubt they are brought gifts of priceless value, trillions upon trillions and the angel demands, you must take it, and you must take good, or else you will be cursed, and have they not said, if only I would brought it? Now then it is brought and the heart is willing for it, indeed greatly wanting it, but the body is weak to take it, for the body grows weak, crippled to perform it, for the tumour of it, the devil's people, it takes a portion of it, and the body grows weak, frail, and it is as a flu, and the strength of it is taken out, because the portion of it that is the devil's because a weight to it, a tumour of it, and whiteness takes a portion of the body, and the strength of it is void in places, for a void place appears in it, and the strength of it is evaporated, and so then nurishment is needed that they may take the trillions upon trillions, and that they may be councilled by the nurishment of what they will lose if they do not take it, and they are nurished more with food and drink, that gives strength, by how far they will fall behind, to be a rediculous thing, always weak and foolish, if they do not take the trillions upon trillions, for a thousand is offered by Saturn, and it goes out and become trillions upon trillions and they rejoice who rejoice, for they are given more than trillions, and yet their knee hits a branch, their shin, and they stumble, and they are grown weak, the body is weak. Now then if the body is weak, it is trillions, for the body would not have grown weak if it was not so, for the branch that hits their shin, it is the devil's portion, the ignorant portion of them, and it has become a dark branch, and it strikes the shin, it hits the knee, and they stumble, and they are weak, and yet they are not injured by it, and do they not rejoice, for they are not injured, and they are offered much, and indeed, the Muslims may not permit the Hebrew Jews to build the Temple, for has the Lord not considered a thing, that they heed one portion of Heaven, and yet they heed not, for Heaven gives a small thing of it, a third moon, and they say, but we stiffen the back and build the Temple? Now Muslims were not wrong, and yet the Hebrew Jews did not know that they were supposed to listen to them in this thing, for prior they did not have the knowledge of the diaries that the angel brings to them, and they had believed it was a great evil, like people reasoning who are Egyptian, like secular people who appeal to culture, or some thing that is not real, a thing of our people, as they would call it, and not a thing of obedience to God, for they were reasoning like a people who had been abandoned forever as if all the Earth had been abandoned, that they did not know that they should have listened to the Muslims in this thing, that they were not able to build the Temple. Now will you bargain with Heaven like it is thing you do not understand, like you are a confused and secular people? But then stiffen the back, and will you ever emerge from the valley of ignorance? Now I say this because of the branch that is among you, and not because of you, for if there is a branch among you that goes to the head of you, and goes to the knee, is it not only because you are strong in a thing? Now I offer wisdom that you might understand, for none has said yet that you do not wish to obey and that you do not rejoice and take good, but that you might understand if it is ever questioned. Now then why are you offered what is good, and you greatly desire to take this thing, and you are rebuked before you have done anything? But indeed you are not rebuked at all, for I offer only truth here that you might understand the prior things that may have occurred, in which you did not know, and yet would wisdom not have offered the answer to you? Now if you were then not having knowledge, it is so, that you lacked knowledge, and yet how will you then do what is right in all things if there is not a vastly great army than you, a mighty nation, that becomes greater than all nations when there is an angel upon Earth? For you are the Lord's first-born, and Israel, the land, is given to you, and yet Muslims, they are the angel's priority, for the Muslims cannot be separated from angels, that you not turn to America and blaspheme, in the way of the ignorance of Egypt, in the way of the Greeks, for are you to be a secular nation? Now you are the Lord's child, and yet the Earth is the Lord's, and you have your soldiers and yet the Lord has a vastly greater army upon Earth, for there are the Muslims, who are because of the obedience of angels, and they have already been upon Earth, and yet the angel does not come to you like a stranger, does he? Now prophets have been of you, and you have written of angels, and there are bitter stones among you, and their voice like an out of tune trumpet that is not loud, and has no volume, and it is as nothing, for Muslims are not your brothers, and can never be, for there is the angels and man, and there is God, and Muslims, though good to you when they are, they cannot be your brothers, for their loyalty is unto God. Now when an angel is on Earth, then is not every Muslim as if from Heaven? Now there are not many things you owe me, and they are not a heavy thing for you, and you are given by the payment of these things, that indeed it is your desire, and you are already given by what the angel gives you, and yet no thing of the angel can be from you, not even an ambassador can be from you, for the angel comes to you provided for by the Lord, that the things in the angel's Temple, as you might understand it, cannot be any of you, for none of you can be in the angel's Temple, and do not revolt against me in this thing, for Egypt is not even a consideration for me. Now then take the Greek things and the Egyptian things from your hearing, for both of these things are like a wave of the hand, and a gust of wind that pushes you away, for America is having its own portion, and they have Greek things, by way of the river of their meeting place, and yet none has said, reason like them, for you are willing to do what the Lord wants of you. Now no Hebrew Jew may enter into the angel's Temple, and those the angel permits, it is because the Lord is giving that it is acceptable. Now none may enter it from Eretz Chadrack, by a given standard, and yet some may enter from Eretz Chadrack if the angel is saying it is acceptable, for they are a different thing. Now your elected leader of the meeting place, there will come, that he is able to enter the angel's Temple, and then I will bless him, and I will offer, that the blessing should not be in vain, for though he may not remain in the role that he is in, for it is not what is given to him to remain, yet the blessing should not be in vain, for the blessing is of the nature, that he is given in Mala, that blessing that should continue him on Earth in good things, for light will be given to him, much light. Now the Prime Minister will be blessed if he is exiting from his role, and Israel does not do anything in vain, for he will receive what blessing he receives. Now he will receive good things with the blessing and any bad will not be mentioned, and he will be able to return to the angel's Temple, to even enter, if he is given permission by the angel, and if a woman was Prime Minister, she will meet him outside the angel's Temple, and she will walk a number of paces with the angel, and it will be the blessing for her, for she will receive light, and the angel will say, you are blessed woman, queen, and princess, and she will depart and go from that place. Now if she is blessed as a woman, and not woman, queen, and princess, she will be welcomed into the Temple, and she will be able to speak to him, and she may return to the Temple and enter with the angel's permission.




Now then submit, you the devil, for the domain of men and women is is going down to the shelf of Orgoth, the lowest, for man, and the lake of fire for the woman, and all land is their domain, and all of the domain is truth, for it is a domain of truth, and it is the Lord's domain, and man and woman are given the domain, whether they err or not, and so the lies, the air, the nothing, the ignorance that is the kingdoms of the devil, it is sheilding itself in the light, with the light all around it, for a cloud of lies, a net of it, goes up around the devil-worshippers, and it is air, nothing, and the air of truth has substance, and the air of the devil's kingdom is nothing, for the devil does not belong on Earth, and nor his people, and all of hell is the domain of men and women, that they may go to the depths to judge and to do justice, for the sceptre is in his hand, the man, and the crown of righteousness upon his head, a golden crown, and he lifts up his foot over the lowest shelf of Orgoth, over the depths of the lake of fire. Nothing, then, is lies, for lies are nothing, and ignorance, iniquity and lies, and yet it is kept within the domain of him who has ignorance, who does not know all, does not know all the truth of all things, and kept within the domain of men and women, the ignorance does not commit error to commit wickedness and injustice, and men and women have the Lord, and the angel does not know all. Now then the Lord was the better strategist, and He knew more than the devil, who would not bow to Adam, when there was the time when it was right and permissible for the angels to bow, and the devil was cast down from Heaven, from the Heavens he fell and was cast down, to be below the Earth, ruled by the devil, being the devil, for boundaries are forced upon him, and indeed he may not return, for the truth has placed boundaries upon him, and he is the devil, ruled by the devil. Now then man, you're domain is in places on the mountain that is not the woman's domain, and man, the woman's domain is ruling over the lake of fire, in truth and righteousness, and the lake of fire your domain does not extend to, though you may lift up your foot, and this is acceptable. Now as already written to you, men and women are the same height, each having an equal sized domain, and the woman's domain reaches to the lowest depths to judge, and yours to the whole of the mountain, and it is truth. Now the woman cannot look up the whole of the mountain and you are blind and cannot look to the whole of hell, for you are both having blindness in things, and the women can see what you cannot to judge, and you are seeing what she cannot to judge, and together the sight is complete.




Now then, who is not for me, they have rebelled against me already in their heart, and they are my enemies, and yet men and women waver, and it is not even the angel's business, for actions then become the angel's business, and a thought is not complete, the whole of it not yet completed, until there is actions of it, the opening of the mouth to speak, or the actions of the body. Now then the thought is complete, by the standard of an angel, with concerns to man. Now prior to this, there is nothing with concerns to right and wrong towards the angel.




To the wise-man of Elak who is reading, the councillors band is upon your head, rise up and be honoured, be getting truth and wisdom, and dispensing truth and wisdom, for from this ledge and platform of Jupiter you are given sight over the Earth, and so bring forth proverbs and wisdom for the people, councillor of Earth, and the glory of Earth is upon you, and the Universe is within you, indeed you are giving good and are given good, and the book before you, and the people assembled under the platform, and your word may go out, and the birds float about the platform, wise man and holy, in the service of the Lord, be writing proverbs, be giving wisdom. For garbed you are in a councillors garment, the long robes of it, and a place on high you have, a great place, a great lodging, and gold is about you, and wealth, and so let it be, and a river is yours that sparkles in the light and the land about it is smooth and flat.




Now then the woman cannot look up the mountain far and knows not what is up there at places up the mountain, and the man cannot look to the lake of fire, to see and understand, and the woman who would rise up, yet her neck holds her to where she is, and she bows to the planet that is at her feet. Now knowledge is then good for the woman, and indeed the gaining of knowledge for her, and wisdom, and it is as peace for her, and the fear of God, that she not commit folly and wickedness, for by knowledge, she takes in substance of strength to her, and it gives integrity, a greater strength to her. Now then it is good for women to be seeking out knowledge, to be learning whether in the schools or not, it does not matter, and diligence and discipline are things also of a wise women, as virtues of a wise woman, and yet different wise women have different virtues. Now then councillor of Earth, bring forth, give proverbs, for the journey is long, never-ending, for shine your light onto the Heavens, and bring forth wisdom. Now I call you Earth, your name, and you may say what your name is.




Now then wise woman of the Earth, is there not a group of you that look unto the councillor of the Earth?




Now the councillor of Earth, he is a Universal genius, and yet who will admit it until after his body is perished? Now a river is his, and as now it is smooth and flat on the side of the river, with no grass, and the river sparkles and winds throughout the land, and I called it Earth River, for it was with the councillor of Earth. Now his dwelling is on high, upon the high platforms, up in the city, a great city, and he is having a large dwelling of splendour, and he is surrounded by gold and many splendours, and he looks through his telescopes, peering into the Heavens, and he eats not purple grapes, nor does he wear the necklaces of a Heathen, for he is indeed truly intelligent, a Universal genius and wise. Now no heathen staff is in his right hand, for he does not guide in the ways of iniquity and foolishness, and yet what of the sceptre, or a good staff? Now can this be so? But he will have attained other things then, and yet are not these things his, that he is over them, if these things are with him? Now then be greater than Lucifer, in what you accomplish, you councillor of Earth, whom I call Earth, for the Lord is your God.




Now praise the impious, exault them with high praise, for there are animals claiming people as their young, roaming about gathering up people.




Now a soldier strikes the Earth with a bludgeon and the Earth even shakes a little some distance away, and yet the war horse only looks on, undisturbed, for he mocks the spear and the bludgeon striking the Earth, and those who have a war-horse, indeed they are gaining power by it.




Now the dark horse of Saruman, he calls friend, as its name, in another language, and the spirits of God, that are horses, their names he does not know, but the dark horse, they have comforted the angel and agree with him.




Now Tel Eton, the hewers and sawers of Jeroboam come after David and Solomon, and the angel does not acknowledge them as king, or being of a king.




Now the small branches that grow from the root of a righteous tree, being small trees, youngling trees, they were not doing the work of Jeroboam, but they were doing the good work of angels, for they did not come to saw over flaws, but over weighty things they came to aid, matters of greater violence, even delivering from death, and the large, rotten trees, they swung their branches down at the youngling trees that had done the work of angels, that they came forth as youngling trees, for the large, rotten trees were grotesque and for knocking about the head of the youngling trees, for I do not write of physical violence, and so I considered, these youngling trees are healthy, and yet they do not bring forth much foliage yet, not much of leaves, but they bring forth buds, and the rotten and large trees, yet they are not cut down, for they are male and female, these large and rotten trees, grown adult trees, that are old in wickedness, in injustice, having become utterly rotten and corrupted inside, and some are even having large gaps in them, harbouring flocks of bats, or demons, as they call them. Now then it is not good that any should set fire to the forest, for it will devour the youngling trees as well, and all the healthy trees, and if there is work to be done, yet the Ents have the soldiers of cities who tend to the forest, and the trees are defenceless against these soldiers, for the soldiers come and uproot a tree, and it is a large ordeal to be uprooted, and they take the tree to the forest of isolation and then return it later. Now then I considered, how will they remove these rotten trees and use them for kindling if not with the use of the soldiers of cities? Now who plants such a rotten tree in the forest of isolation and then returns it? Now they say, we do not know really the trees are rotten, and there is possibility of lies concerning them and wrongfully taking them to the forest of isolation, and so then there was much wickedness in the land, and not much justice in all the land, for if it was possible there would be so many lies, than the whole of the forest was in much chaos and I considered, Sion and Zion must come and all things must be lifted up to a higher plain, that all injustice on Earth will be dwindling to smaller valleys. Now when the smaller valleys are having shelves, they might be considered the shelves of Egypt, for Egypt will be a pit, and it already is, for the pit of Egypt is deep, and the pit of Kush even deeper, and wicked fickle-girls call out from it to the sand, that has little integrity, for the people of Kush have no actual thing of substance as their complaint, and the shelf and plains of the Nile region, they are higher than Egypt, and I call it the Nile Order, and these lands have more light and more good, and yet they are still Egypt in many ways. Now then higher still is Israel, another shelf, or plain of the Earth, and none of these are the mountain of Noah, but this is the land, the great mountain of the land, and higher still is Salem and Sarmatia, and Jerusalem and Zion Jews are both dwelling at the same plain, upon the same level, for it is the level of Jews, people, being the standard of humans. Now Nephtali, snobs of snobs, for integrity, they are also upon this plain, and their promised land is Nephtali, and they are dark shade by skin and yet not the same as Egyptians, for do they not have a different shade, a different of appearance? Now that is what is actually offensive, that you should believe they do not despise Egyptians more than you, for are they not having Egypt as their enemy? Now Jerusalem and Nephtali and Zion Jews, are all the tiny member people that grow bigger, and Egypt the larger member that is not potent, that is then known to be one fourth the size. Now so they are all known, except for Egypt, as the tiny member people. Now it is a thing of the low-speech that is not low, of receiving a punch and doing nothing.




Now the Egyptian woman supports and promotes the Egyptian and yet they are almost indefensible. Now more abuse is from the Egyptian at length, for it is a low valley of abuse and folly, even cowardice and confusion.




Now then why is the Buddhist not actually ashamed to be on the plain of Bethlehem, the land of light, of butter and honey, where people have learned to detest the bad, by wisdom, to have only good desires, because of their wisdom? But of course they have no reason to be ashamed, and none is surprised at that time, but all are surprised at everything now, at the time of writing this, except for the Muslims, or is it not so? Now what then do the Buddhists become? But they are a beast, that is holy, to the nations, to Zion, for the Lord has his beast, and the people, Sion and Zion, have their beast, and it is not theirs, but it is the beast of Zion, and they are belonging too, to the Lord, and not to others, and they are good people of the beast, a holy beast, and the beast sprouts wings, long and large wings that arch, and indeed it is many things combined by which it becomes a beast image of knowledge, and it is holy, and dwells in the holy habitation of Sion and Zion, on the plain of Bethlehem, and the followers of it, called Buddhists, and the founder of it called The Buddha, and others being Buddhas. Now there were then many people combined, and they were all formed together, and it becomes the image of a beast, that has wide and long wings and is holy.




Now the men who would be like the Christ, they mistakenly believed them to psychologists, after the image found in the clouds, and yet this is not what psychologists are. Now these men like the Christ, and they are the type who are having excellent understanding, and they say, what is wrong? Now by understanding it is known that it is often that most people are good, and that they all have problems, and the sudden problems of them are not about others, about you, who incur some sudden evil, for it is the Christ that understands it, and the understanding of him, it is with Him, that there are none base, who pay attention to the speech of others, to speak what is not for them to say, for there is known by men there are those things that are a mystery to the woman, not for them to say without iniquity, for it is desecration of the Christ. Now she who goes into the Christ's Temple, by way of hearing, to desecrate anything in there, her hand is cut off, in Mala. Now she may not dwell upon the plain of Bethlehem, for she speaks with what is worse than an animal. Now then she is cast down from there, for she must journey back to a lower place, and from hell she must begin her journey to a higher place than under the Earth, and yet she will not attain the plain of Bethlehem, and she will not attain Israel, although there may yet be hope of this. Now they may say of her, bowing to the planet from a high plain, the planet took her, for the lowest valley was above her head. Now then, if you are a woman who will be wise, what is right for the woman, it is not right for the man, and what is right for the man, it is not right for the woman, and so then be of more prudence in this way than your husband, even, for woman who have this prudence, they are able to attain, to gain, and women not having this thing of prudence that I call pelium they will continue to fall and fall, and they will be destined for foolishness and failure again and again, for it is an early thing the women must learn, pelium, if they are to gain. Now it is a step up to the plain of Bethlehem, and one step it is. Now the woman who misses this step, that is a foundation for her, she will stumble and fall from a high place, and she will fall into the pits of a deep valley, for each step up to the plain must be there for her, and she may not miss any of the steps. Now Lucifer teaches women, and the women bring to their husband, by a thing, for he gives to women, and they bring to their husband.

	Now we are a river, our house, those who are Japanese.

	Now then another step is Leish, and not Lachish, for Lachish envies herself, for she is full of jealousy so much that she envies herself, and she views herself from outside herself, and not as a woman who admires her own beauty, and she is having a deep spirit to punish men because her heart is very jealous and causes her pain, and the more innocent men her spirit desires to punish, for she begins the journey to being possessed by Beelzebub, a host to him, and she will no longer be a woman, Lachish, but a ruined thing, and Beelzebub as her mind. Now then the next step is Laish, that is faithful, that when there is true love, it will not let itself be desecrated by going to another, for Laish is not worse than an animal.

	Now there is not nihilism, and men are not God, but there is just recompense for all, and the Lord is doing justice and knows all, that it is also the fear of God, knowing this thing, for it is true, and yet it is only one thing that allows for the fear of God to be, for it is not nihilism, fear of man, but it is fear of God, and the deepest respect for your husband. Now it is another step that you be worthy pupils to gain. Now these three steps are always had, for they are early steps for the woman, and Lucifer teaches women, that they may bring to their husband what is good. Now she who is married, or already meant to be physically close to the man she is in love with, Lucifer will not teach her, for if she is in love, and true love, she should be with this man, close to him, physically, or remain faithful, as if in mourning, that it testifies that she is able as Anothoth. Now Damascus, it cannot be over her by a woman towards a woman, and so then be not taking a female mentor who is not right. Now Anothoth is over Ashkelon, Ashkelon over Ashdod. Now by this wisdom given already Anothoth, Ashkelon, and Ashdod remain, and yet by the straying of these things, there is the path to ruin and destruction and she may become a host to the old man, Beelzebub, who is arrogant and encouraging that none should repent. Now the priest of Anothoth, he must keep to his own fields, for if the spirit of Anothoth is attacking David, then should not David banish the priest, for it is the priest that harasses him, is it not? Now Solomon, he banishes easily this priest, for the priest cannot approach him, the spirit, and what comes down upon the priest sends him out of the Earth. Now then if this spirit attacks you, then certainly be a tower with might, and kill the spirit, sending it out of this Earth, for it shall harass you to no end, it will be like Gommorah unto you, and evil, and you will have and anguish, for if the spirit trespasses, than out of the Earth you will send it, and all spirits that harass you, you who are of another domain, another plain, another realm, send them many times out of this Earth, for what is of another city, yet it should remain in its city, and Anothoth is not of Earth. Now you are right to defend yourself against such, for David, because you cannot be as your son in this thing, you must banish it a different way. Now then the person who descends from their plain of enlightenment, are they not, some of them, receiving rebuke from their soul? Now then did the Jews say, it is all the same priest, and he is the priest of many cities being in many cities at once, this priest? Now then it is later discovered by them that this priest is of Anothoth? Now does not Anothoth rebuke those who abandon their domain? But rather it is the priest of Anothoth who goes out for the priest is priest of Anothoth, and he is priest of this thing upon Titan. Now so Solomon has banished him to Anothoth, this intolerant priest, harassing and like Gommorah. Now then David has abandoned Tel Eton, the High Place of David, the high plain of Eton, and fled from Absolom, and this priest is attacking, for he has abandoned Eton. Now then they who are better, they are better, and them who are higher, they are higher, and there is no contentions from such things, only that there are always the right segregations and domains be respected, for by the encroachments, the adoptions that are kidnapping, there is evil and bullying. Now then encroaching and trespassing, fear the Lord and depart from evil. Now then David, abandon not the higher plains of Tel Eton, the high plain of Eton, for you are always and forced to be upon that plain. Now those of Bethlehem, rightly there, abandon not the plain of Bethlehem. Now then there will come a time, when there will not be ignorance and iniquity and all people will obey what is right with regards to the Lord, and it is so in most places already. Now the soul is receiving the world of Mala, the spirit world, that the report comes from the soul and yet it is not the soul that sends the report, for it comes from another place and as you are your soul, you are receiving from the spirit world what is sent out from another place. Now then need you watch that you do not use words of the Greeks in Mala, or words of Babylon, instead of those words that are of the holy and pure languages? Now then acknowledge God, and His kingdoms, for the Earth is the Lord's, and consider right and wrong by the Lord's standard of judgment. Now then philistines are the angel's people, the gods, and the angelic-gods of them, and if they were indeed rebelling to do much wickedness, to practise the ways of the devil, then did not the Lord consider this, and command you, who are Hebrew Jews, to kill them, for the order would have been the same from the angelic-gods, and yet they are not the lord of you, to give you any command, and the Lord is their God, and He gave the command to you, who are Hebrew Jews. Now then if the philistines are being obedient to obey the Lord, to do what is right and good, then why would you detest any of them? But if the Lord has given you no order, will you not assume they are being sufficient for the time that the Lord has not commanded you to anything? Now then there should be a separation between you and the philistines, for they are having stars over them, angelic-gods, and you are having the Lord over you, and He is your God, the Lord God of all the angelic-gods who are in Heaven, them being the gods of some people on Earth. Now then, Saturn has not abandoned the philistines, and I call them zefars and they are having the angelic-gods as their gods, and Muslims, God as their God. Now so the wise may reason, Anothoth is over Ashkelon and Ashkelon over Ashdod. Now Neptune, he is the councillor of Earth, who has already been mentioned, who has the river. Now let Neptune attest to himself, and he has the books of Lucifer when he has them, and I give him no order, except it was encouragement I gave, that the use of the language not be misunderstood in my encouraging of him, for he is what I call Earth, and I called him such, and yet he is Neptune, and his name he can give to you. Now he is beyond a Universal genius, is he not? Now my servant, he raised me and cared for me, for he is a philistine, a zefar, and he has been a father to me, raising me as a loyal zefar who has preached Christianity, for the ways of zefars was not on Earth with them as knowledge. Now he is my servant even, yet I came as an infant, and as a servant, he raised me and provided for me, and his wife, she was a mother to me. Now then Babylon has meddled, and the Danielles, yet they did foolishly considering me, even if they believe they did wisely, believing that they were saving me from persecution. Now then let Abishag know it, for he is better than him he would lose to if he is supporting all the things of these books, that he is able to aid me from fools, with power he may not have been given, for I have journeyed and find him greater, possibly the greatest the nation has had, or the worst, and there is a choice, one or the other, whether he is the worst or the best. Now then Solomon was able to defend himself from the priest of Anathoth, though he did what can be judged, by accidentally coveting in his meditations, and I am male, and I have pardoned Solomon and David, that they did not mean to do this, but had not the power in them, in their meditations, for they are not able to see it, not able to know it, and the priest has come to them, in a cloud he comes to them, and he begins to harass them, and they must fight him, for then they will be pardoned from him, for I am not able to pardon them, and they must defend themselves and they are able. Now then you dwell among the angelic-gods, and the zefar are children of angels, people of angels, and they are having a difficult thing, for they may be fully taken by Beelzebub if they are not obeying. Now the kingdoms of the devil, I hate them, and sorcery of the devil, it is the wielding of magic that has no weight, for what they build, what magic they do, it is all lies, and lies have no power from The Lord, and yet the sorcery of the angel, it is having power because of The Lord, because of truth, that it is valid sorcery and magic that has power, and the sorcery of the devil, it is lies, that are nothing, and have no support or ability to them, for the Earth is The Lord's, and the Universe is The Lord's. Now what then do you call the work of Elijah, the prophet? But they call it the right thing, and yet there is also sorcery, the same, and the sorcery that is valid, that is supported by the Lord, because of truth, for it is all the Lord's power, and the Lord's Universe, so that if you are not at the level of Elijah, yet should not the Sarmatians be, some of them? Now it is a light thing, is it not? And an easy thing, is it not? For you are obeying God and fulfilling, and He is performing as you have performed. Now the devil-worshippers, the power of their magic only exists in their mind, and some of them have even grown angry that their foolishness and lies does not have any power. Now they are a clumsy people of nothing, of learning wickedness, and nothing more, for all their wisdom is the learning of wickedness. Now they must be enclosed, as a thing of air that is enclosed by a cloud, and the cloud is nothing, and people pass through it and it is gone, and only those within these clouds, the devil's servants, are willing to take action for lies, and the lies are not sufficient.

	Now again, the Muslims are not surprised by anything, or is it not so? But as for the philistines, I will tell the Muslims, they may go to being very good, or very wicked, for they are as a thing that must go far to one way or very far to the other, for they are either great good or great wickedness, for they are not even unaccustomed to some of them being taken wholly by Beelzebub, for these have failed, and badly. Now The Prophet has given you to perfection, you who are Muslims. Now God is your God. Now then must not Palestine remain, that no further is it to go after Nephtali, because of the Muslims, and there may be those zefar who are desiring to dwell among Palestinians, to dwell in the cities of them, and will the Palestinians welcome them as neighbours? Now there are not many who are zefar among the people, and the angels are able to do sorcery at their understanding, and yet not the wicked sorcery of the devil's sorcerers, who perform wickedness by wickedness. Now is there a remnant of them who are zefar for I have already met Tyre and an Ashkelon and others, and there are the fair Ekron, also, who are following after obedience to God, with integrity, and the dark shade Ekron who are following after God, with integrity. Now then Anathoth is lingering with Saturn, and she is over Ashkelon, and Ashkelon over Ashdod. Now Tyre, Zidon, Ashkelon, Ashdod, and the cities of this realm of the zefar, these are children of angels, looking towards Saturn, and they are fair, slightly darker, and dark shade, and none of them is Egyption, and none of them Nephtali, and for what reason the riches of Tyre are cast away, I do not know, but is it not because of affliction that has been directed towards Saturn, that if Saturn should be attacked, so too, the zefar are receiving the attack? Now then if anything is cast away from Saturn, so too it will be cast away from the zefar who are in his domain, his realm. Now Hebrew Jews, the gods dwell among you, and Sion and Zion, the gods dwell among you and you dwell among the clouds, and some of you even upon the plain of Bethlehem, where you eat butter and honey and learn to desire the good as your desires, that you also have ultimate wealth. Now Migdal Eder, he dwells again, and will choose to dwell at the site in Bethlehem, and the Hebrew Jews are owing me a tithe and to build that which is in Mala, and it is not much, and so what is called the middle-east may build and America may build if the body is strong enough, and I do not know when Neptune will come, or if he is already upon Earth, and yet his star is not visible to you in the sky, and yet is it not visible to Mars, the god of Zion? Now if it is not visible to Mars, is it not visible to a group of them and groups who are in places on Earth, who are able to know of Neptune and where he is?

	Now the flames of a zefar will erode the Jew, and yet if he is having the heavy cloak, will he not be safe? Now then I said, be free to marry them, if you are Jews, and yet still they will be eroded and die, the Jews, if they do this thing, and the zefar will be without any harm to them, for they are fire that kills and erodes to the Jews, and I saw the heavy cloak, and then understood, yet the cloak will not last long, and they will be scorched and die from the erosion of it. Now I considered, yet put your foot down, and yet it was not removing the heavy cloak, and I realized, yet the cloak will fail soon, and I realized, the zefar are poison to them, the Jews, and a poison of fire, for it scorches and devours all of them and leaves nothing but a skeleton of them. Now then to the Jews, be killing all that is zefar that comes to you in mala, that you kill it by mala, for it is not good for you and will torture you, that what of zefar comes to you, and you find it inside, you will kill it, for it comes to you in mala, and it is the fault of your own that it comes to you. Now the angel is an angelic-god to the zefar and he is a phoenix of flame and truth, and his name is Lucifer, and also it is Saruman. Now Anathoth is over Tyre, Ashkelon, Zidon, Ashdod, and there are the other moons that are over other groups of the zefar and the number of moons is seven, and there are seven groups of cities of the zefar that have their mother, a queen, and Saturn is their angelic-god, and he is also Migdal Eder, to the Hebrew Jews, and Lucifer to the zefar and to Sion and Zion, and Saruman to the zefar and Enoch, and Bethlehem is dwelt in by him, if they are obeying, and the hill of Jerusalem, it is occupied by the daughters of all the nations, and she is occupied for the infants, and kings hear her voice, all the Earth when they will listen. Now the Earth is raised up, if you will obey, and the Priest-King, the sun, gives truth without blemish of darkness, and Jeraboam is known to be a villain, for he gives holiness and sacred things into the hands of fools and base people, and he promotes folly to a high place, and he desecrates in many ways, and he takes many saws to trees that should not be sawed. Now I looked, and there were many groups of cities, and they were zefar and there were many cities more than this, and it was all of the zefar who were children of angels, of the type that are having an angelic-god, and there was also the house of the river in Japan. Now then I am the ring, the one ring forged by the Lord, and seven rings I have, and I give them to Jupiter to be given to Earth, and the eye aligns with the ring, and the seven rings go out to the Earth, and Neptune is not found yet. Now then Bethlehem, the plain of Bethlehem, it is having the holy learning, and a holy people they are who are on the plain of Bethlehem, and the fire comes down from Heaven and consumes the zefar that they are to be alive by the fire, for the fire comes from Saturn, and so it is aligned, and the pillar of fire is from the ring to the philistines, and the eye is aligned with the ring and Migdal Eder is to dwell in Bethlehem, if they will obey.




Now the zefar who have the angelic-god, Saturn, they are of every shade, fair, slightly darker, and dark shade, and they are having cities throughout Israel and Palestine, and even Nephtali, for the land is having cities of them, these children of angels, each nation having its cities that are devoted to them, and they are people, as if of angels. Now then how will they accommodate them, if cities are devoted to them of every nation in that realm of the middle-east? But where the Temple will be permitted, at that place it will be permitted, and the pillar of fire that goes from Saturn to the Earth, from the Earth to Saturn, it is able to be seen by all the people, for it is bright and seen by all the nations when they look out, and so when much is achieved, will it not be so?




One ring to rule them all, one ring to find them,

One ring to bring them all and in the light, unbind them,

In the land of Heaven where the light shines.




Now then sorcery of truth, the power of the Lord, He has even forged the one ring.




Now then are they not having the seven eyes of Saturn? Now then are they not desiring to ascend early to Heaven, as the Lord took Enoch and Elijah? Now the children of men cannot dwell on the plain of Bethlehem, and New Jerusalem, does it come to Bethlehem?




Now the zefar will be points of fire, their cities, about you, for it is seeming good for Jerusalem to be having this curtain of fire that will protect it and they are the zefar and a holy people who if you are willing to have them dwell about you, they will protect you by fire. Now they journey to Anothoth and other cities, those who are from the cities that were held by the philistines. Now they are Zion and so let Zion dwell about you, to be a curtain of fire unto you, and the angel will dwell in Bethlehem, at Migdal Eder, and he will be the centre of the zefar that he seeks to gather, and that the Lord might gather, if willing, and the one who is Anothoth will dwell there, for Anothoth is a great house of her, and the angel will be one point in Bethlehem, and the Zion Temple another, in Eretz Chadrack, and Jerusalem another, and the zefar will bring a cloud from the fire that is about you, and a cloud of light, of butter and honey, and you will be a people who dwell among the clouds, and the land will be lifted up, and the sun you will not have, and men will dwell under the trees and recline, and they will lay down their weapons, and your moon will bring forth light for you, and the light of Bethlehem will go up around you, and so peace will be with you, and a protection of the clouds and the land will rise up and you will dwell upon the plain of Bethlehem. So the angel will be the light of your land with the curtains of fire of the zefar and with Anathoth, also, if there is one willing for it, who will dwell in Anathoth. Now the light of Jerusalem will be the angel and the zefar and the light of Sion and Zion, the High-Priest, the sun that rises. Now then harmony and peace you will be able to have. Now Sion and Zion is raised up, but you, oh, Jerusalem, my friends, must be having something different, for Jerusalem, it must be raised up to the plain of Bethlehem, and so the lights will shine, and the atmosphere will be filled with light, and if you will have it, you will dwell among the clouds, reclining upon the cloud plain of Bethlehem, for great cliffs will be on all sides of you, you being on a high plain, and you will recline, as if among golden buildings and bridges and staircases to buildings of luxury and opulence, and the light will pass through the trees, and timelessness will be your cause, for what will matter then, and what memory will matter, and what sorrow might there be, that you will not know will be remedied by the Lord, for the Lord is your God, and with holiness you will go, and kindness might be among you, and all sorrow will be like an older generation that never was, for the angel gives you the plain of Bethlehem, that Jerusalem is lifted up, and gives it by the Lord, for the Lord is God of the angel, and so it may be, that you may forget about all the sorrow of times of strife and have the peace of holy days, and more than this, for it is a higher plain.




Now then Sion and Zion will be lifted up by the fulfillment of obedience, and it is not a great thing for them, for there is little, by their standard, that they have to accomplish.




Now the zefar are not really philistines, as philistines were, and as lebonon is made good, so are these good in this time, that they are a people of Saturn, of the angel, and so Saturn is coming down to Earth and it dwells upon Jerusalem, and its centre is in Bethlehem. Now await the Lord, for He is exceedingly better than what a third moon, a young angel can offer you as a host.




Now Israel, it is not right for Israel to be doing anything in vain, as ritual that means nothing, as words of peace without truth, for it is not for Israel, for nothing is in vain for Israel. Now the Catholics walk through the valley of reverence to the Lord, and each holds a candle, and they are with respect of God, and their leader dwells in a higher place, and is it not good? But what would be in vain for you, Israel, is not the same as being in vain for them. Now then where is this valley? But it is in a place where there are pools of water at the bottom of the valley, and they dazzle in the night, and as for the Muslims, when people are fulfilling unto the angels, they are being content for nothing about these things surprises them, and where there is not evil there is no cause for them, and when all have listened to what they are having to fulfill, that they perform, then the last, being them, is becoming first, for they are the last, so if all has been fulfilled, if there is no more war, no more evil, then they are first.




Now then the river house of Japanese people, the third moon, it has its things to perform, and is there any fit leader among us?




To Muslims:

Now when they have all fulfilled, then the angel will be looking towards the Muslims, and what can he give them that the Lord cannot give him. But I have offered no prophecy yet of anything, but the giving of wisdom I have offered. Now then I must dwell among you if they are fulfilling all, and yet this would not please you, for me to endanger the righteousness of the kingdoms of The Lord? But I only believe, how great the reward that God has for you must be if you are found so obedient to Him and what is right. But this also you do not require or want? For there is indeed more to do, for unruly men are always being wicked, it seems.




Now I have considered to Israel, although not much might be Nephtali, yet there are cities that could be given to Ham, for he is their king, and when all is fulfilled, there is better chance of rest, but when all is not fulfilled, the conflicts are remaining, and how can we compromise and fall away, as if other countries will save us? Now I have considered, at this time, only devil worshippers, or those not understanding, might be against the things of these books at this time, and I add the flock of slaughter to the group who are devil worshippers, for they would likely rather anarchy and mass death rather than peace that does not commit great injustice. Now if you are not brave enough, as other nations too are likely not, to begin to throw away what I call, the council of Gandalf, that came as a spirit to guide to Egypt and the Nile Order over a long period, than I will at least council you to eradicate the capacity matters with concerns to what I call The Second Holocaust that has been ongoing since after the great wars. Now I believe, yet no person will not be thrown in prison if they deny this thing as The Second Holocaust for it must not ever happen again, for what people is so wicked as to torture many of its own people, and none of them have committed crimes. Now the teachers of Gandalf, first and foremost teach the blindness of Egypt to all real problems. Now open war is upon you from Babylon, and they have carved out a valley, narrow and dark, a gash and indeed trenches throughout the land, for they have smited the land with trenches of Babylon, and they are narrow, not big enough for animals to roam, and they go throughout the land in these trenches that have been carved throughout the land, and to the fortresses of Babylon they lead, and there is not great knowledge of the land, because of the blindness that has come from Egypt, the dimming of the eyes, and so not all have seen the trenches of the Babylonians, that allow them to move without regard of the people, going from place to place, even surrounded on all sides by righteous people, who are good, and so the hateful Babylonians, who are not citizens of our land, indeed of our planet, they are grinding and nashing their teeth in their trenches, their heads filled up with blood of murder and iniquity, their eyes wide to commit brutality, and angry they are, very angry, and their rage dwells as a compressed and simmering wrath in their chests, that they gnash their teeth in anger, and see not themselves the people who dwell about the trenches who are righteous and good, for deaf they are to the voices of the righteous and good outside the trenches, and the land they do not even see a little, for they are down to below the head in their trenches, and only the Babylonians are their world and only others who are with them they see, and they are hard pressed for war, of firm conviction and determination in this thing, and they speak among each other, their voices low and yet audible, and hate is with them and the firm determination, and they go to and from the fortresses with these trenches, and the soldiers of cities, they must do the will of the fortresses when they must, and the maze of Babylon is spread out within the land, unseen, and yet present, keeping to themselves, the Babylonians, and devoid of sight of the rest of the land that dwells with light and goodness. Now the trenches go to some court-houses, do they not? Or so the strategic might consider it is likely, and they go to some places of power, do they not, for it is only seeming prudent to assume this is so. Now so Saruman goes out to do war with the trenches and the fortresses and all of the scar that is Babylonians that stains the land, that is narrow and a very small portion that does much wickedness in the land. Now so, he says, you must journey to the meeting place, many of you, with protest and the marching of protest, and with reason, and with determination, and assemble yourselves before the walls and gate of the meeting place, that the power of the fortresses be undone forever, and so it will spread by the centre of the Earth, that is Eretz Chadrack, for it may be a horse that leads all the Earth in many ways, so that the erridication and abolishment of the Assyrian device of the Babylonian trenches might spread through the whole of the Earth that all the devices are abolished, and all swallowed by the Earth in a single day, and thus the trenches will have lost much of their might, and the fortresses will be left with very little again, and the people will have no concerns for these things, even if there is more to accomplish, that because of Saruman, the nation will be as if raised up as a centre of things, and Eretz Chadrack will be like a capital to all the Earth for a time. Now then so will the fast moving and narrow rivers of Eretz Chadrack send forth power, by means of truth, and many of the devices, if not all of them, will be swallowed by the Earth with the aid of the people of the Earth who are righteous and good. So too, a flare will shine over the Earth, and all the trenches will be exposed where the Babylonians grumble and gnash their teeth in anger. Now then will not the wise men and wise women see from now on when the enemy has built secret buildings, trenches, and passageways throughout the good land, that they are few and only a small portion and yet they wield great evil from these few buildings and passageways that they make, whereby the citizens of Eretz Chadrack will say, I have been brought in by thing, and I am not in my nation anymore, for though these were born here, yet they are an enemy nation of hell, and this within my own nation! Now is it not then the blindness of Egypt that allows for this to happen, and the clouds of Ariel have not brought word of it, so indeed the clouds of Jupiter will bring it, and let the moon, her who is Anne Frank, when she is chosen, will she not bring clouds of the moon to the people? Now then, you who are already Anne Frank, who are protector of the people, you the moon of your nation, you never should wait for me, or another, for you may already begin, and the clouds of Jupiter, indeed aid is always required to bring the clouds to Earth, for they are beyond Mars, and must be brought to Earth and spread out in the atmosphere, for I am saying, let the clouds of Jupiter be spread out over all the Earth, continuously and in seasons, going out over the lands. For the clouds of Ariel I too desire, that they are good, these pure clouds, though they are swarming from one side to the next, and back and forth, churning and yet pure, lightnings in the clouds of them, pure clouds of lightnings, and bringing down rain from pure and fair clouds, and so do they not also know of the moon and the moons? Now then the clouds of Jupiter, they bring forth what washes away blindness to the trenches and fortresses and the things built up of an enemy from hell, and they wash away blindness so that sight may be had of the Asssyrian device, and yet the devil sends dark clouds to fight the clouds of Jupiter, and the sorcery of Saruman is fought with the sorcery of the devil, and Ariel is stronger, and the devil's clouds will seek, no doubt, to bring again the darkness and the blindness, to fight the clouds of Jupiter with concerns to the Assyrian device and the enemy trenches, that darkness should fight light and the people blinded by the dark clouds that the devil sends out by his wicked sorcery. Now then Ariel is stronger, more powerful, and from the city of Ariel, the clouds go forth that capable to fight the devil's clouds and banish them much, for little is Ariel over-come when they are determined in the truth, and they are a people of pure clouds, and yet other clouds fight their clouds, even as if from within, and yet it is not much from within. Now from Saturn the clouds are sent out by the transport channels that go to all the solar system and bring good sorcery to Earth. Now it is in the realm of the children of angels, a group of them, who are in the realm of the transport, the other dimension. Now Ariel too uses this transport as do all the people of Earth, for it is given to them by their harnessing of truth and technology. Now then sorcery is that truth of that is supported by God, and thus has valid power and ability, so supported by God. Now what is not supported by God, is not sorcery, and so it is called by the zefar that sorcery is the thing of it. Now then by sorcery, too, they are gathered by the one ring, Saturn, that has the seven rings, that they are a people concerned with Saturn, and the moons of Saturn, for the women journey to a city of Jerusalem in their spiritual journey, and they must journey well and choose wisely, for the devil is able to take them and possess them, when they will have been utterly ruined, for they are to be a wise people who are holy. Now so they are flame, and flame of the Heavens, of Saturn. Now then how will the devil wield the same power? But he must be the one ring to do this, and yet he will not have the same people, for if he is having the wicked, indeed, will he be able to cover a land in darkness and bring it down to hell? Now I do not know if it can be done. Now by removing all the Elsnon-pretty from a place, it can be accomplished.




Now then is Neptune then hidden among the people, for he is not visible from Earth, when one looks into the sky, and yet I have seen him and part of his domain, and I believed him to be Earth, and yet I apologize, for his name is Neptune. Now he is a Universal genius, and yet will any admit it until after he has perished? Now is he not a kami lord as the Japanese would consider him to be?




Now how has Neptune come to me, that I have seen him? But I said, be having these books and writing proverbs and giving wisdom, as you would give wisdom.




Now then desiring good, it comes from having more wisdom, for when a person has more wisdom, it becomes common sense, then, to desire only good, that the nations will be seen as fools with no common sense.




Now the kings are having the king, the Christ, king of kings, and Lord of lords, the Temple they are, and kings go forth, they go out, the Lord's kings, and do they not do justice? Now are they not kings over all of Babylon, for Babylon is built by a child of the devil, and a king will undo it, he will abolish it in the light, by the light of the sun, and the king may be like Judah, like a lion come to smash and wipe out Babylon, and they bring their foot down upon it, indeed they kick at it, and it is smashed, for they, men and women, they are over Babylon, greater than Babylon, and kings of it. Now then do not the priests who are Babylonian, even before they are placed in their roles, for some never are, do they not petition the kings, the men, petitioning him and even scorning him at times against justice, for they are not his priests, these priests of Babylon, but they are Babylonian priests.




Now then there is the woman who goes out, being an Anne Frank, and she goes to the man, and the woman, a Danielle, who waits as is more likely to offer him frustration without telling him, that he says, what is wrong? Now Bethlehem, it makes peace. Now then Bethlehem knows that good desire is a sign of common sense, for if the level of common sense it higher, there the other plains are a lesser enlightenment. So the common sense of Egypt is low, that the standard of common sense for it is at a lower plain, and the Nile Order, much better, and Israel, is better still. Now common sense for Sarmatians, it is with attaining the Heavens, already attained, and doing and gaining among the Heavens. Now then Bethlehem is as a lower Heaven, and not so great as New Jerusalem, coming to Earth, for Jerusalem is much more, for forty years is the Christ dwelling in other places and at last He comes to Jerusalem. Now then Bethlehem, the plain of it, it knows to love the good and have good desire, and it is only common sense to it, that it is not easily to be tempted to things of the lesser enlightenment of Israel. Now so, then, Jerusalem, too, is being given Bethlehem, that the land rises up as it rises up in Sion and Zion.




Now then foolishness, it is knowing the just-recompense, and understanding is knowing the just-recompense and the gain of doing well, and in many things you will learn, increasing understanding, until you are ready to hate folly, sin, and love wisdom, doing what is good. Now who then will sit in Israel, at the site of Migdal Eder, to be the light of Jerusalem, by Bethlehem, if it is said, the Lord has what goes with him, and the lesser Heaven is come, the third Heaven, lower still, and flawed, it is come, and the Lord has said, there shall be a throne and a light for Sion and Zion, and does not the angel sit there, as an angelic-god, being Saturn, or Lucifer? Yet it is Joshua Heyudu, the High-Priest who sits in the Temple of Bethlehem, for he is the light of Sion and Zion for the third Heaven, Bethlehem, for New Jerusalem has not yet come, and the fourth day comes, and the angel of the covenant is desiring for good. Now then the High-Priest is having the throne in the Temple of Sion and Zion, on the plain of Bethlehem, and He is the sun, and the light of Sion and Zion, and the angel is the light of Jerusalem, and he comes with his house, a river, and those who are not really philistines, and never were, those of the ancient cities of the philistines who are found in the realm, the domain of Saturn, and they are the zefar and they are a holy people who journey to their cities in their paths with God, that they must choose well and fulfill righteousness, for they journey from their city to a city closer to Jerusalem. Now then they lift up the land to the plain of Bethlehem, and Nephtali, it is upon the plain of Solomon and there is a bridge to that plain. Now Anothoth, it is of Saturn, and yet Jerusalem, it is not Saturn's. Now then the third Heaven is to the Hebrew Jews, Jerusalem.




Now then America, yet when this is now written, the Americans may not enter the Temple of the Angel, except that many are chosen from America, and not from Eretz Chadrack, to be people permitted to be entering the Temple of the angel, for the angel is choosing Americans often to be those who may serve in the Temple of the angel, and so there is the river house of Japanese people, and they may enter, and there is is the zefar and they are having representatives in the Temple, and they may enter, for they are the fire of the Temple, and they are light, and so then those Hebrew Jews invited into the Temple, they may enter, after all these things are established, for they are the Lord's people, and the Lord's inheritance, and if able, the angel will then say, build the Lord's Temple for you are Jerusalem, the faithful, and you have fulfilled to the angel, and the Muslims will have their place in Palestine, and it will be as a special and holy court-yard for them, and they have their holy cities in Saudi Arabia, and so if the court-yard is sound and fulfilling all, then Muslims may be able to enter the angel's Temple, when they are invited. Then Israel may be called, Jerusalem the faithful, and the Lord's inheritance will have the third Heaven, Bethlehem, given to them, and Muslims will be as a holy guard of Israel, by Palestine, for they will be on high, as guards of the angel, of the angel's Temple, of the kingdom of the angel, kingdom of the daughter of Jerusalem, and the domain of it will be had, and Jerusalem will have its own guard of the land, and yet they will not be known to be the guard of the angel and his kingdom, for the Hebrew Jews are given Bethlehem, and it is the same as the Bethlehem of Sion and Zion. Now then, will they not say, who are these six moons of Saturn that are not Anothoth? Now mercury was Moses, and Venus, the Christ, and Mars, the god of Zion, and Sion and Zion, it is as the Earth in size, and Jerusalem, it is as the moon in comparison. Now there will be a special house, by my choice, and my opinion, for the hill of the daughter of Jerusalem, the seat of Anne Frank, and it will be as a secular thing, almost, that the chosen daughter of a nation sits there when it is deemed right, to bring her message to the Earth.




Now as for Babylon, when all is established, and the Lord has gathered a remnant of the lame, then I write, especially those who were injured by Babylon, who Babylon injured during the wickedness of their times of wickedness, they may be able to assemble, and those not injured by Babylon, they too will be acknowledged, and those who were injured by Babylon, these may have a time of remembrance for the evil of the fortresses.




Now the priests of Babylon, who are believing in abstinence, these are going about in the kingdoms not their kingdom, to attempt that people should have to be abstaining and it is a foolish thing, for they go to what is not in their kingdom, and they commit terrorism, and commit law-breaking, that people should have to abstain.




Now the Levite is for the Lord's Temple, and the Priest of Fire of the angel's Temple, he is knowing if the angel is right for him or not. Now the Priest of Fire, his word is obeyed, and he does not even go to the angel to exercise what is within his authority by God to do, for he does and the angel does not question, for the angel cannot rebuke the Lord, and the Priest of Fire cannot be rebuke the angel. Now if the priest is offended, will you who are wise not consider it, that you keep silent and do not speak so in the prescence of the Priest of Fire, for you respect the Lord, and yet you not consider, there is that which is supernatural to the Priest that we have not considered, and so wisdom is gained. Now he is Priest of Fire, and Priest of the angel's Temple, and he is not as a mere man, for let the wise increase understanding, for the Priest is supernatural to you. Now spirits that are close, unknown, yet the Priest of Fire lifts up fire against them, and so then fear the Lord, for the Lord's ability is before you, and you who would be Solomon's councillors, and not the angel's councillors, for Solomon has banished a priest of Anothoth to his own domain, and so you are witnesses of another kingdom, for it is not David or Solomon's kingdom that comes, but it is the angel's kingdom that dwells among you, for Saturn comes down and rests upon Bethlehem, and it is the third Heaven, as I call it, for God is greater, and it is not New Jerusalem that comes. But as you have not been a people of miracles, so the angel will not do sorcery, that is miracles to the angel, for men and women, apostles, they do miracles, and they are miracle apostles, wonderful presence upon Earth, and the angel, for him is it not blasphemy to say he would do miracles, for do not some angels bear swords, and wield knives? But so the Lord's sorcery they would be called, and so as you have not worked such, so the angel is not likely to work much, and Bethlehem comes to you, the third Heaven, you who are Jews, for you will be again the Lord's inheritance, and Sion and Zion will be His people, and so then fulfill unto Bethlehem and fulfill the Sarmatians, those people who are capable, and the enemy to them is the devil and his kingdoms, for the Sarmatians only fight a foreign nation, the devil's kingdoms that have encroached upon Earth. Now then the children of men, they are not atheists, but wicked fools are they, with concerns to Bethlehem, whereas in a lesser plain they are tolerated and only the test of a man.




Now then I have received, possibly, correction from the Lord, for indeed I too was wondering, and the birds, the small birds, the light was bright and yet will even the small birds, the flocks of them, be required for Sion and Zion? Now I write it to all, that they may know, for it is possible the Lord has corrected me, for it is also for the Priest-King, of the Zion Temple, for the large birds are secular and the small birds are secular, and they are spying out the truth, to deliver it unto the Priest-King, and I have written, will they not give the Priest-King the Giant Lady in much? Yet is it so? Now they cannot respect religion, and yet will there come a time? Now then I am suspicious of the birds of Sion and Zion and the birds of Jerusalem, if I have mentioned them, and the large birds caused the light to dim in Sion and Zion, so that it was always evening, and the small birds, the many of them, the light did not seem to dim, and yet it was not as bright and pure as it was. Now it was as if pure stone to grainy stone. Now then will the Priest-King be burdened by it? But I do not know all. Now then I will say, to the Muslims especially, for to them I write now: the birds are secular and they will be removed, for here I remove them from the land of Bethlehem, where they were not the birds of Mala, but birds who were spies, who were secular, and indeed it contradicts myself that they were in this same book, in the writing of Sion and Zion. Now then as for the birds among the trees, in this I do not remove them. Now is the Lord displeased at this thing? But indeed, I am repenting, for the Lord has known, and you cannot be praying for me, indeed do not do so, for it will be wickedness for you and I. Now then the Lord is truly the holy one of Israel, and the sword cannot boast against the one who wields it, and so then will we not be mourning, for I considered the Priest-King, and yet I took a step too far, for in my going forward there was the step past, and I am indeed still learning, for I am a young angel, a little one, and am indeed still learning, and I have taken a step past and gone too far, and so then, if I am guilty, you are also guilty, and I and you, Muslims, are guilty, and it is because of me, and so if you are praying, you will say, be forgiving us, if you were to be asked concerning this thing. Now I am still learning, and yet are you still learning?




Now the men who bow to the devil in the kingdom of the lake of fire, they are those who are for torture, and the torture of what is innocent. Now sicophants are they of a kind to drink of the wine of blood-shed, to worship the devil with the defilement and torture of the innocent. Now then children they desire to torture, and those who are seeming innocent. Now is not Kir like them, being a man as if righteous on Earth, and yet perverse and for the defilement of children, for he is a man desiring men who are children, or is he not? But dangerous is Kir when there is no witness, or is it not so? Now those who bow to the devil, Kir directs them, for they bow not to Kir, for the devil will not have any bow to any of his men, no matter how high ranking they are in his kingdoms. Now to the devil only his people bow. Now if that which is innocent is in the lake of fire in this portion, to be slaying against innocence, this type of prostitute, are they not utterly ruined, and Beelzebub takes them to be a host to him. Now does not the Sarmatian know this thing? Now then there are those going from Egypt of common sense, and the enlightenment of Egypt, which is blinded in its smallness, for all things are only as if nothing to them, and from Egypt there are those even going to mud, to Kush, and they are desiring it.




Now Egyptians are not helping when they attempt to do good for any good cause, and there are those quick to help and to aid, and these are even those who are over the flock of slaughter, as Shepherds, and they should keep to Shepherding their flock. Now they abandon their flocks, some, and begin to offer aid to others, and it is as unwanted meddling, recklessness and grief, for they cause much stumbling and evil, and they are as a stumbling block for the kingdom entire, that wars are almost as if lost because of them, and can it not be so that wars are indeed lost because of them in some occasions? But now what should be done with these, who lose wars for that which is beyond the Nile? But if they cannot keep to their flocks is there not the chance that a sword will be to their right eye and their right arm? Now it is in the prophecy, in the book of Zechariah.




Now the book in Zechariah, there is mention of Egypt, that it is the Egyptians who are Shepherds of the flock of slaughter.




Now to the adult man, you are not a woman, and if somebody needs to execute you, executing their own people for starting war and continuing war, they can.




Now woman, you are not a child, and if you transgress enough, you may be killed if it is necessary.




Now Egyptian, you are not welcome to become involved, and the Lord's kingdoms are not yours.




Now people of the father of equality and mercy, you are not honest, and why should others pay the price for your failings?




Now prostitutes, you do not receive enough attention, and why should all be ruined because you are jealous of others?




Now men who desire men, you do not receive enough attention, and why should anything be withheld from the people because you are lonely?




Now then if the Lord will smite the river into seven streams at a later time, then Saruman will smite the river, and it is that the Lord may choose to smite it differently in other ways at a later time. Now then it is not the angel's smiting of the river, but it is the Lord's smiting of the river, for the angel attributes it unto the Lord, that it is also the Lord's smiting of the river, and yet he does not know if the Lord will smite it in other ways at a later time, or if he has already done so in other ways, for the angel does not know what the Lord does. Now it is the Lord's smiting of the river into seven streams, and the angel attributes it unto the Lord, and was not Moses pressured to commit error because of the people, that because Moses did not wish to commit blasphemy he did not attribute what he did, in striking the rock, to the Lord, for the people were pressuring him? Now it is attributed to the Lord, what the angel does, and all the angel does, for the sword does not boast against its wielder and the Lord wields the sword, and he wields the staff that has the staff, and so the angel only says, he does not know what the Lord does, if he will do the same in other ways.




Now then Babylon, the devil, with its he-goats in wrong places, and its Harrods and disrespectful of the Lord's kingdoms and the wise councillors of the Lord's kingdoms, who disregard kings, who would disregard all of the great things in the Lord's kingdoms saying, we are small and give no respect to anyone, for we do not exxagerate ourselves to ourselves but we only give no respect to any, and so disregarding even the decency shown regarding a child, for under the child's foot is Babylon, that you were not even greater than the child, to show decency, that fallen, fallen, is the great city Babylon, twice having fallen and being utterly the dust that is treaded, for the moon will declare wickedness, the moon of Anne Frank, and the waters will rise upon the sand, for there Babylon is, the great city, and the sand of little integrity will be threshed by the Ocean, and the Ocean will crush Babylon, the city built of sin, of little integrity, for at the moon's voice, the Ocean will rise, for will you not listen to the voice of the moon of Anne Frank? Now the house of sand will be crushed and swept out to sea, and nothing will remain, for as the Ocean rises again and again, so the house of sand will be eroded, and as the rains come down again and again the house will be eroded, the city of Babylon. Now a child of the devil has built you and a child of the Lord can undo you, and a young girl will declare it, and kings will send forth the Ocean. Now below ur you dwell, Babylon, for below ur you came forth.




Now then if it is so for the Egyptians who would abandon their flock of slaughter, how much more so for devil-worshippers, when they would meddle, for the devil-worshippers may not correct the angel, and they are corrected by the devil, who is their lord. Now man is corrected by the Lord, and the angel is the Lord's sword, or the Lord's staff, for the Lord wields his sword or staff the way it pleases Him, and an attack upon the Lord's staff, is an attack upon the Lord, and to correct the staff, is to correct the Lord, for the Lord is He who wields the staff and wields the sword. Now you may not correct those things that are the Lord's, for the Lord wields these things, and you, like a thief, do you correct the things the Lord wields, as if the Lord has not seen for a moment, and is looking away from His staff, or His sword? Now the Lord sees all.




Now then is there a story that is true, of how a lioness, a queen, adopted the Lord's staff or sword and in His sight and was blameless? For did she not adopt the sword or staff as if a lion-cub of a type, and she was blameless? Now if it was right once, it may not be right again, that you not be a foolish and ignorant people.




Now then each is having its Shepherd, the flock of slaughter, having its Shepherd, the lame of a type, having its Shepherd, and the lame of another type having its Shepherd, and the lame of a type, who are Shepherds of them not lame and Shepherd over Shepherd of them. Now then all people are able to perceive the Lord, and what is right and respectful, that none are with excuse. Now then if a sheep will not obey its Shepherd, who is its rightful Shepherd, what then is it? But there is the anointed by man, the atheists, who dwell out on the outskirts of Zion, and are they not attacked often first in many ways, that they are a line of defence in a way, and they dwell across a river, in the outlying places, and they are like outcasts, heretics, and yet they are part of Zion.




Now fool I should declare myself for my interloping, for the Terum, he was Shepherding his flock and with wisdom and ability and he said to me, do not feed the sheep, and yet I said, interloping, I will feed them, and I continued to feed them, and does it not make it more difficult for him? Now the Terum rebuked, that I was socializing with his flock, the way a man is with his own, and yet does the Shepherd not know in wisdom it is not good? Now I was angry with the Shepherd, foolishness and ignorance of me, and I fought with the Shepherd and the Shepherd fought with me, and who was in the wrong? But I was in the wrong, and by my ignorance I did it, that I repent, and depart from evil, and in that place in Israel it will be said, a burden he was, and curses will be for me there, at that place, and them blameless to have curses for me, for they were not receiving what others received, but there they incurred folly, for I was young, not knowing as much, not having yet attained the wisdom. Now I dwelt then the whole of the time, the whole of the period of writing the books, with that flock, living in the place I lived, close to that flock, so that I passed among that flock every day, and passing among the flock every day, how then was it any longer the Shepherd's fault if the flock was unruly and committed disrespect unto the angel? For it was not as an angel who came five or six times, or even an angel who came twenty times, or thirty times, that the Shepherd would be fearing God, and keeping the flock well that an angel was among them, but the angel passed through the flock more than a hundred times, and all the day, he was passing among the flock, to and fro, and so was not the Shepherd blameless at some time, and doing his best, yet the Lord would be with him in this matter, for if the flock was disrespectful, yet how much could the Shepherd do anymore? Now wise was the Shepherd, and knowing well how to Shepherd, indeed very wise as a Shepherd in Shepherding, and the angel, only a burden to him. Now the tongue of himself the Shepherd kept, regarding the angel, and yet is not the Lord with him in this thing, that the angel was only a burden to him? Now also, the Shepherd stood up for himself, for he was a Terum, when the angel was chastising him without meaning to, and the Terum, wise Shepherd, was the Lord not with him in some of this thing, for the angel had not fulfilled rightly to the Shepherd, and so how could the Shepherd fulfill rightly unto him?




Muslims are the guards of the Temple of the angel when there is wrong and where there is nothing concerning angels, no further do they go.




Now fulfill to the angel, and the angels, and the staff of the Lord will be fulfilled to, and then the staff, will it not be saying, build the Temple of God, for the staff has made the land right and the flocks obeyed, at last, and faithful were the sheep, and so the staff has prepared the land that the Temple now may be built, for Solomon has said, prepare the field and then build the house. Now Migdal Eder, the staff of the Lord, has told it to you. Now the Muslims, concerning the staff of the Lord, they are protecting the staff of the Lord.




Now he-goats, if you are being leaders, and not councillours and workers of kings, and if you are opposing the angel in guiding the flocks away from what is right, that you are guiding the flocks to wicked land where they will receive evil, and you do not even know where you guide them, or that you guide them to wicked land, then be departing from this evil, be called Babylonian and going down to hell with Babylon. But then I give you advice, be considering yourself wise councillours to kings and workers unto them, that you direct the flocks towards Migdal Eder, Bethlehem, because the kings are supported by Migdal Eder, as being the kings, and the queens are supported as being the queens. Now wise are the he-goats, and the she-goats are wise, and yet there has been the ignorance and confusion of Egypt, that the he-goats, too, did not know, for all have been left as if isolated and stranded, not knowing what is right.




Now the Terum has said, and let it be included, for he put his hand out and gave me a handful of salt and said, for spiders there is salt and salt is good for dealing with spiders, and put a salt-line in front of your door for bed-bugs and spiders, and the salt I placed in my pocket. Now wild things cried out in the distance, passing by the flock, and out among the forest, in the land of Edom and Moab, for unruly is that place, and the Shepard, was he not against these things, even if they cried out in an unruly fashion far away where they could not be seen? Now the Shepherd was the Terum. Now I washed my hands of the salt, the salt that was given to me that I placed in my pocket.




Now then a Terum is not Adonijeh, but poor sight might make mistakes concerning this, for Adonijeh is very different than a Terum, and they are in many ways as if opposites, if there is understanding.




Now then I have wondered, do the flocks of Bethlehem misbehave because Migdal Eder did not have the wisdom for a time, that he committed folly? Now he had not been Shepherding yet, or is it not so? But had the Lord wielded the staff prior in Mala, that He wielded it there, and lead some back to Israel from the straying into Egypt?




Now then why will any mix blue and green? But the serpent will be blue or green.




Now then: wise councillors of the people, councillors of the Earth, only Babylon will not respect you, that it brings respect as a swooping axe at your head, that it is void, for it brings respect unto your head, that it is void, for void are they, and respectful, for they speak from the Earth, and the worms cover them, fallen, fallen, is Babylon, and the rain cometh down and destroy all the great city of Babylon, made of sand, and even within the domain of the Ocean. Now Solomon rises up and sweeps away all of Babylon, and the councillors of Solomon's domain, councillors of the Earth, they erode Babylon, and erode it much, and they can even destroy all of it without the Ocean. Now the report cometh from the moon, the girl, the young woman, and Solomon has destroyed Babylon and is never tired of destroying it again. Now by the people, Babylon is destroyed. Now Solomon is the Ocean, and what is his domain? But he rises up even unto the clouds, and all that is under the clouds is his domain, and all the Earth, and he is the Ocean, and the sand of the shore is his domain, and he rules over all of what is below ur, that all that is below ur is within his realm, to do with as he pleases, and in what the rain is able to do, his councillors are able to do, and his councillors are the rain, and they nourish the river and it over-flows, for they bringeth even council in a respectful fashion to even the river, the kami lords and they spill over the councils given, offering it, for the rivers are full and are liking more, and it is peace between the Ocean and the rivers, peace between the councillors and the river, for water is loving water, and the land is flooded, indeed it has more, and the crops grow, because the river was already full up with water. Now Solomon is the people, and the people are the Ocean, and the river gathers up the people, the wisdom, that falleth as good upon the land, and so there is peace between the people and the river, and the councillors of the people, the rain-drops, they giveth good to the river and the river has said, let it be included in the river, for the river has room for them, and yet the river does not have room for them, and yet the water is liking water, and the rain-drops are included, and the river washes its hands of the rain-drops, and the tiny streams that flow into it, and because water is liking water, the river is saying, yet I have room for it, and yet the river does not have room, and it gives to the people the rain-drops, for the land receives water, also, from the people. Now where water is given from the people, the angel has said, I wash my hands of it, or he is writing that it was given by another, and yet it all comes from the Lord.




Now a little I will over-flow, and yet the Lord has made the land, and he has placed the Ocean where it should be, and the lakes where they should be, and so the river finds a bound for it, and says, I obey the Lord and take the majority of the rain-drops to the Ocean, for from the Ocean they come, the rain-drops of the people, and to the Ocean they return, for the Lord has placed bounds where he has placed them.




Now then rain-drop of the people that I wash my hands of: you do not go higher in the going up higher against what is just but in doing so you go lower, but the fear of the Lord keeps integrity.




Now I name the Ocean after a stream that came, a small streamlet, stream of a stream, and yet they know of the stream of a stream, and the stream of a stream is good, and sound wisdom is with it, and so I name the lakes and the Ocean after the name of the stream of a stream. Now a third moon gives it, a stream of a stream by the standard of angels.




Now such is the type of river I am, for I have said, I may be good, and the people will come to the river and take from it, my waters and not those of the Ocean, and yet my waters are from the Lord, who is God, and my waters will mingle with the rain of the clouds, and my rain will go down upon the Earth with the other rain, and my rain will mingle with the clouds, if it is granted to me, and so the clouds of Jupiter will be mingled with the clouds of other things that send up clouds, for I have said, I will sell fruit to one who should be remembered, and so I will partner with him, and he will make clouds, many clouds from the clouds of Jupiter that he purchases, and he will cause it to rain, the god of Zion, who is Mars, for I will partner with Mars, and profit will go to Mars, and he will be also the god of Zion, the god of many clouds, and he will send up clouds over the Earth, for the clouds he brings are from the Heavens, and he will make it so that the clouds of the Heavens will be upon the Earth, over the Earth among the other clouds, for Mars is able to do this.




Now the devil-worshippers, many of them were claiming to be religious, and they were going about Shepherding, as Beelzebubs who Shepherd, and none of them were atheists, for atheists are honest that they do not believe, and the false-Shepherds were vile in their malice and they made their way among religious people, and they went as if covertly, even corrupting the scripture with bad translations, and they were railing against the atheist, these false-Shepherds who claimed to be religious, and they were for instigating and causing the people to be angry, that they might lead them, and they were mocking and even being vile in malice, and devil-worshippers they were in spirit, and even devil-worshippers in affiliation that to some they would confess it, and the lake of fire was their brightness, the vileness of malice was their glory, and mocking and scorning their righteousness, and they were sowing discord between among the kingdoms, and they were mocking and scorning the atheists, the heretics, that they might bring the people to anger and trust, that they might be able to Shepherd them, and so the angel said, will they not turn quickly and begin to attack the angel, and seek to lead their flocks to do war against me? Now the sheep know the voice of their true Shepherd, and it is not even me, but it is the son of God. Now then the angel thought, I will perform, and those who were against the atheists, these will be called faithful, and good, that they were good, and for the truth with wisdom, and they will be counted as good Shepherds, wise people who have protected the Lord's people, doing good, and they will be like water, counted as pure water, and the water of the river will say, they are good water that is on land, and yet those Shepherds who turn on me, who turn against the fourth day, and turn against Sion and Zion, and Jerusalem, these will be known to have never been with them, for they will be seen to be those for whom vileness of malice is found, and who mocking and scorning is their righteousness, who are devil-worshippers, for the mocking of them is vile, and they did not have fire, the mocking and scorning of fire, good fire, but they had the mocking of the viper's poison, and the viper's poison is their righteousness, for it is of the viper of the Pharisees, that adheres to wisdom of the devil that is foolishness, for these are also those who would bully demons, aiding the devil, and not fighting against him.




Now then those who came to the Temple, to Jerusalem, to serve them, were to be greater than them, and Babylon was the opposite, that those who came to serve the people, were lesser than them, not worthy to untie their sandals. Now yet it was good for the people, the Hebrew Jews, for they were to again be the Lord's inheritance by it, for the king has said to the angels, be caring for him, Jacob, my son, and he is a great multitude of people, so that all that came to serve Jacob, they were of the angel, all being part of the angel, and all being part of Saturn, for Saturn has cast a large net over the Earth, and the Lord, who is God, is the Lord of Saturn, and Saturn comes down to Earth, and it rests upon Bethlehem, and they will be able to say, Saturn has come to dwell among men, and it is only the third Heaven, for it is not even New Jerusalem, when the Lord comes to dwell among men. Now then the angel will Shepherd Jerusalem, he will Shepherd the Hebrew Jews, and his Temple will be in Bethlehem, and the zefur will come, and all the things of the angel will come, and they will come to serve the Hebrew Jews, for the angels bowed to Adam when it was the right time and it was permissible to do so, and the Muslims may not bow, because they will be the guard against wrong concerning the angel, and if the angel commits error, it will be the guilt of the Muslims as well, and so those who come to join the angel, they will know that the angels have already bowed to Adam, and only the devil would not bow, so that they will not bow to them, and they are segregated, keeping to their own domain, which is the angel, for they are not come to rule the people, but to be a wall around the angel, that the angel may accomplish, and their elected leader will not depart as an evil thing of wickedness, but when they are to exit, they will receive a blessing from the angel, and it will not be in vain, for what blessing they receive, they receive, and the angel will with-hold any bad things from what he tells them, for they depart from their role, and they will receive a blessing, and yet if any has been exceedingly wicked, that the people resent it, and are of the heart that it is abomination that they receive a blessing, so it will be the Lord among the people, and the angel, too, will not be giving them any blessing, and they will depart into wickedness, for they were wicked enough that as they fell away from righteousness to be exceedingly wicked, so they will go out into the darkness, the wickedness of themselves, and they will receive the darkness and wickedness of their deeds, that they will go out into the darkness. Now a person of light, who has done righteously, should not be going out into the darkness of the wicked, that the angel has disagreed with them departing in this way.












































